Florida, session 2026, HB4061.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
47
48 Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Land Reserve
49 Stewardship District Act."
50 Section 2. Legislative findings and intent; definitions;
Page 2 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
51 policy.—
52 (1) LEGISLATIVE INTENT; PURPOSE OF THE DISTRICT.—
53 (a) The lands located wholly within Hillsborough County
54 covered by this act contain many opportunities for thoughtful,
55 comprehensive, responsible, and consistent development over a
56 long period.
57 (b) There is a need to use a single special and limited
58 purpose independent special district unit of local government
59 for the Land Reserve Stewardship District lands located within
60 Hillsborough County for a more comprehensive community
61 development approach, which will facilitate an integral
62 relationship among regional transportation, land use, and urban
63 design to provide for a diverse mix of housing and regional
64 employment and economic development opportunities, rather than
65 fragmented development with underutilized infrastructure which
66 is generally associated with urban sprawl.
67 (c) There is a considerably long period of time during
68 which there is a significant burden to provide various systems,
69 facilities, and services to the initial landowners of the Land
70 Reserve Stewardship District lands, such that there is a need
71 for flexible management, sequencing, timing, and financing of
72 the various systems, facilities, and services to be provided to
73 these lands, taking into consideration absorption rates,
74 commercial viability, and related factors. Therefore, extended
75 control by the initial landowner with regard to the provision of
Page 3 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
76 systems, facilities, and services for the Land Reserve
77 Stewardship District lands, coupled with the special and single
78 purpose of such district, is in the public interest.
79 (d) While chapter 190, Florida Statutes, provides an
80 opportunity for previous community development services and
81 facilities to be provided by the continued use of community
82 development districts in a manner that furthers the public
83 interest, given the size of the Land Reserve Stewardship
84 District lands and the duration of development continuing to
85 utilize multiple community development districts over these
86 lands which would result in an inefficient, duplicative, and
87 needless proliferation of special-purpose local governments,
88 contrary to the public interest and the Legislature's findings
89 in chapter 190, Florida Statutes, it is in the public interest
90 that the long-range provision for, and management, financing,
91 and long-term maintenance, upkeep, and operation of, services
92 and facilities to be provided for ultimate development and
93 conservation of the lands covered by this act be under one
94 coordinated entity. The creation of an independent special
95 district will assist in integrating the management of state
96 resources and allow for greater and more coordinated stewardship
97 of natural resources.
98 (e) The existence and use of a special and limited
99 purpose local government for the Land Reserve Stewardship
100 District lands, subject to the Hillsborough County comprehensive
Page 4 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
101 plan, will provide for a comprehensive and complete community
102 development approach to promote a sustainable and efficient land
103 use pattern for the Land Reserve Stewardship District lands with
104 long-term planning for conservation and development, provide
105 opportunities for the mitigation of impacts and development of
106 infrastructure in an orderly and timely manner, prevent the
107 overburdening of the local general purpose government and the
108 taxpayers, and provide an enhanced tax base and regional
109 employment and economic development opportunities.
110 (f) The creation and establishment of the special
111 district will encourage local government financial self-
112 sufficiency in providing public facilities and in identifying
113 and implementing fiscally sound, innovative, and cost-effective
114 techniques to provide and finance public facilities while
115 encouraging coordinated development of capital improvement plans
116 by all levels of government, in accordance with the goals of
117 chapter 187, Florida Statutes.
118 (g) The creation and establishment of a special and
119 single purpose independent district is a legitimate supplemental
120 and alternative method available to manage, own, operate,
121 construct, and finance capital infrastructure systems,
122 facilities, and services.
123 (h) In order to be responsive to the critical timing
124 required through the exercise of its special management
125 functions, an independent special district requires financing of
Page 5 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
126 those functions, including bondable lienable and nonlienable
127 revenue, with full and continuing public disclosure and
128 accountability, funded by landowners, both present and future,
129 and funded also by users of the systems, facilities, and
130 services provided to the land area by the special district,
131 without unduly burdening the taxpayers, citizens, and ratepayers
132 of the state or Hillsborough County.
133 (i) The special district created and established by this
134 act shall not have or exercise any comprehensive planning,
135 zoning, or development permitting power; the establishment of
136 the special district is not considered a development order
137 within the meaning of part I of chapter 380, Florida Statutes;
138 and all applicable planning and permitting laws, rules,
139 regulations, and policies of Hillsborough County control the
140 development of the land to be serviced by the special district.
141 (j) The creation by this act of the Land Reserve
142 Stewardship District as a vehicle for providing timely, cost-
143 effective, and efficient public infrastructure, facilities, and
144 services is not inconsistent with the Hillsborough County
145 comprehensive plan.
146 (k) It is the legislative intent and purpose that no debt
147 or obligation of the special district constitute a burden on
148 Hillsborough County.
149 (2) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this act:
150 (a) "Ad valorem bonds" means bonds that are payable from
Page 6 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
151 the proceeds of ad valorem taxes levied on real and tangible
152 personal property and that are generally referred to as general
153 obligation bonds.
154 (b) "Assessable improvements" means, without limitation,
155 any and all public improvements and community facilities that
156 the district is empowered to provide in accordance with this act
157 that provide a special benefit to property within the district.
158 (c) "Assessment bonds" means special obligations of the
159 district which are payable solely from proceeds of the special
160 assessments or benefit special assessments levied for assessable
161 improvements, provided that, in lieu of issuing assessment bonds
162 to fund the costs of assessable improvements, the district may
163 issue revenue bonds for such purposes payable from assessments.
164 (d) "Assessments" means nonmillage district assessments
165 including special assessments, benefit special assessments, and
166 maintenance special assessments, and a nonmillage, non-ad
167 valorem maintenance tax if authorized by general law.
168 (e) "Benefit special assessments" means district
169 assessments imposed, levied, and collected pursuant to section
170 6.
171 (f) "Board of supervisors" or "board" means the governing
172 body of the district or, if such board has been abolished, the
173 board, body, or commission assuming the principal functions
174 thereof or to whom the powers given to the board by this act
175 have been given by general law.
Page 7 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
176 (g) "Bond" includes "certificate," and the provisions
177 that are applicable to bonds are equally applicable to
178 certificates. The term also includes any general obligation
179 bond, assessment bond, refunding bond, revenue bond, bond
180 anticipation note, and other such obligation in the nature of a
181 bond as is provided for in this act.
182 (h) "Cost" or "costs," when used in reference to any
183 project, includes, but is not limited to:
184 1. The expenses of determining the feasibility or
185 practicability of acquisition, construction, or reconstruction.
186 2. The cost of surveys, estimates, plans, and
187 specifications.
188 3. The cost of improvements.
189 4. Engineering, architectural, fiscal, and legal expenses
190 and charges.
191 5. The cost of all labor, materials, machinery, and
192 equipment.
193 6. The cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements,
194 and franchises acquired.
195 7. Financing charges.
196 8. The creation of initial reserve and debt service
197 funds.
198 9. Working capital.
199 10. Interest charges incurred or estimated to be incurred
200 on money borrowed before and during construction and acquisition
Page 8 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
201 and for such reasonable period of time after completion of
202 construction or acquisition as the board may determine.
203 11. The cost of issuance of bonds pursuant to this act,
204 including advertisements and printing.
205 12. The cost of any bond or tax referendum held pursuant
206 to this act and all other expenses of the issuance of bonds.
207 13. The discount, if any, on the sale or exchange of
208 bonds.
209 14. Administrative expenses.
210 15. Such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental
211 to the acquisition, construction, or reconstruction of any
212 project, or to the financing thereof, or to the development of
213 any lands within the district.
214 16. Payments, contributions, dedications, and any other
215 exactions required as a condition of receiving any governmental
216 approval or permit necessary to accomplish any district purpose.
217 17. Any other expense or payment permitted by this act or
218 allowable by general law.
219 (i) "District manager" means the manager of the district.
220 (j) "District roads" means highways, streets, roads,
221 alleys, intersection improvements, sidewalks, crossings,
222 landscaping, irrigation, signage, signalization, storm drains,
223 bridges, multi-use trails, lighting, and thoroughfares of all
224 kinds.
225 (k) "Land Reserve Stewardship District" or "district"
Page 9 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
226 means the special and single-purpose independent special
227 district unit of local government and political subdivision
228 created and chartered by this act, and limited to the
229 performance of those general and special powers authorized by
230 its charter under this act, the boundaries of which are set
231 forth in this act, the governing board of which is created and
232 authorized to operate with legal existence by this act, and the
233 purpose of which is as set forth in this act.
234 (l) "General obligation bonds" means bonds which are
235 secured by, or provide for their payment by, the pledge of the
236 full faith and credit and taxing power of the district.
237 (m) "General-purpose local government" means a county,
238 municipality, or consolidated city-county government.
239 (n) "Governing board member" means any member of the
240 board of supervisors.
241 (o) "Land development regulations" means those
242 regulations of the general-purpose local government, adopted
243 under the Community Planning Act, codified as part II of chapter
244 163, Florida Statutes, to which the district is subject and as
245 to which the district may not do anything that is inconsistent
246 therewith. Land development regulations are not considered
247 specific management, engineering, operations, or capital
248 improvement planning needed in the daily management,
249 implementation, and supplying by the district of systems,
250 facilities, services, works, improvements, projects, or
Page 10 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
251 infrastructure, so long as they remain subject to and are not
252 inconsistent with the applicable county codes.
253 (p) "Landowner" means the owner of a freehold estate as
254 it appears on the deed record, including a trustee, a private
255 corporation, and an owner of a condominium unit. The term
256 "landowner" does not include a reversioner, remainderman,
257 mortgagee, or any governmental entity which is not counted and
258 does not need to be notified of proceedings under this act. The
259 term "landowner" also means the owner of a ground lease from a
260 governmental entity, which leasehold interest has a remaining
261 term, excluding all renewal options, in excess of 50 years.
262 (q) "Maintenance special assessments" are assessments
263 imposed, levied, and collected pursuant to section 6.
264 (r) "Non-ad valorem assessment" means only those
265 assessments which are not based upon millage and which can
266 become a lien against a homestead as permitted in s. 4, Art. X
267 of the State Constitution.
268 (s) "Powers" means powers used and exercised by the board
269 of supervisors to accomplish the special and limited purpose of
270 the district, including:
271 1. "General powers," which means those organizational and
272 administrative powers of the district as provided in its charter
273 in order to carry out its special and limited purposes as a
274 local government public corporate body politic.
275 2. "Special powers," which means those powers provided by
Page 11 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
276 the district charter to implement its specialized systems,
277 facilities, services, projects, improvements, and infrastructure
278 and related functions in order to carry out its special and
279 limited purposes.
280 3. Any other powers, authority, or functions set forth in
281 this act.
282 (t) "Project" means any development, improvement,
283 property, power, utility, facility, enterprise, service, system,
284 works, or infrastructure now existing or hereafter undertaken or
285 established under this act.
286 (u) "Qualified elector" means any person at least 18
287 years of age who is a citizen of the United States and a legal
288 resident of the state and of the district and who registers to
289 vote with the Supervisor of Elections in Hillsborough County and
290 resides in Hillsborough County.
291 (v) "Reclaimed water" means water, including from wells
292 or stormwater management facilities, that has received at least
293 secondary treatment and basic disinfection and is reused after
294 flowing out of a domestic wastewater treatment facility or
295 otherwise reused as an approved use of surface water or
296 groundwater by the water management district.
297 (w) "Reclaimed water system" means any plant, well,
298 system, facility, or property, and any addition, extension, or
299 improvement thereto at any future time constructed or acquired
300 as part thereof, useful, necessary, or having the present
Page 12 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
301 capacity for future use in connection with the development of
302 sources, treatment, purification, or distribution of reclaimed
303 water. The term includes franchises of any nature relating to
304 any such system and necessary or convenient for the operation
305 thereof including for the district's own use or resale.
306 (x) "Refunding bonds" means bonds issued to refinance
307 outstanding bonds of any type and the interest and redemption
308 premium thereon. Refunding bonds may be issuable and payable in
309 the same manner as refinanced bonds, except that no approval by
310 the electorate shall be required unless required by the State
311 Constitution.
312 (y) "Revenue bonds" means obligations of the district
313 that are payable from revenues, including, but not limited to,
314 special assessments and benefit special assessments, derived
315 from sources other than ad valorem taxes on real or tangible
316 personal property and that do not pledge the property, credit,
317 or general tax revenue of the district.
318 (z) "Sewer system" means any plant, system, facility, or
319 property, and additions, extensions, and improvements thereto at
320 any future time constructed or acquired as part thereof, useful
321 or necessary or having the present capacity for future use in
322 connection with the collection, treatment, purification, or
323 disposal of sewage, including, but not limited to, industrial
324 wastes resulting from any process of industry, manufacture,
325 trade, or business or from the development of any natural
Page 13 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
326 resource. The term also includes treatment plants, pumping
327 stations, lift stations, valves, force mains, intercepting
328 sewers, laterals, pressure lines, mains, and all necessary
329 appurtenances and equipment; all sewer mains, laterals, and
330 other devices for the reception and collection of sewage from
331 premises connected therewith; and all real and personal property
332 and any interest therein, and rights, easements, and franchises
333 of any nature relating to any such system and necessary or
334 convenient for operation thereof.
335 (aa) "Special assessments" means assessments as imposed,
336 levied, and collected by the district for the costs of
337 assessable improvements pursuant to this act; chapter 170,
338 Florida Statutes; and the additional authority under s.
339 197.3631, Florida Statutes, or any other provision of general
340 law, now or hereinafter enacted, which provide or authorize a
341 supplemental means to impose, levy, or collect special
342 assessments.
343 (bb) "Tax" or "taxes" means those levies and impositions
344 of the board of supervisors that support and pay for government
345 and the administration of general law and that may be:
346 1. Ad valorem or property taxes based upon both the
347 appraised value of property and millage, at a rate uniform
348 within the jurisdiction; or
349 2. If and when authorized by general law, non-ad valorem
350 maintenance taxes not based on millage that are used to maintain
Page 14 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
351 district systems, facilities, and services.
352 (cc) "Water system" means any plant, system, facility, or
353 property, and any addition, extension, or improvement thereto at
354 any future time constructed or acquired as a part thereof,
355 useful, necessary, or having the present capacity for future use
356 in connection with the development of sources, treatment,
357 purification, or distribution of water. The term also includes
358 dams, reservoirs, storage tanks, mains, lines, valves, pumping
359 stations, laterals, and pipes for the purpose of carrying water
360 to the premises connected with such system, and all rights,
361 easements, and franchises of any nature relating to any such
362 system and necessary or convenient for the operation thereof.
363 (3) POLICY.—Based upon its findings, ascertainments,
364 determinations, intent, purpose, and definitions, the
365 Legislature states its policy expressly:
366 (a) The district and the district charter, with its
367 general and special powers, as created in this act, are
368 essential and the best alternative for the potential future
369 residential, commercial, office, hotel, health care, and other
370 similar community uses, projects, or functions in the included
371 portion of Hillsborough County consistent with the effective
372 comprehensive plan, and designed to serve a lawful public
373 purpose.
374 (b) The district, which is a local government and a
375 political subdivision, is limited to its special purpose as
Page 15 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
376 expressed in this act, with the power to provide, plan,
377 implement, construct, maintain, and finance as a local
378 government management entity systems, facilities, services,
379 improvements, infrastructure, and projects, and possessing
380 financing powers to fund its management power over the long term
381 and with sustained levels of high quality.
382 (c) The creation of the Land Reserve Stewardship District
383 by and pursuant to this act, and its exercise of its management
384 and related financing powers to implement its limited, single,
385 and special purpose, is not a development order and does not
386 trigger or invoke any provision within the meaning of chapter
387 380, Florida Statutes, and all applicable governmental planning,
388 environmental, and land development laws, regulations, rules,
389 policies, and ordinances apply to all development of the land
390 within the jurisdiction of the district as created by this act.
391 (d) The district shall operate and function subject to,
392 and not inconsistent with, the applicable comprehensive plan of
393 Hillsborough County and any applicable development orders (e.g.,
394 detailed site plan development orders), zoning regulations, and
395 other land development regulations.
396 (e) The special and single-purpose Land Reserve
397 Stewardship District does not have the power of a general-
398 purpose local government to adopt a comprehensive plan or
399 related land development regulation as those terms are defined
400 in the Community Planning Act.
Page 16 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
401 (f) This act may be amended, in whole or in part, only by
402 special act of the Legislature.
403 Section 3. Minimum charter requirements; creation and
404 establishment; jurisdiction; construction; charter.—
405 (1) Pursuant to s. 189.031(3), Florida Statutes, the
406 Legislature sets forth that the minimum requirements in
407 paragraphs (a) through (o) have been met in the identified
408 provisions of this act as follows:
409 (a) The purpose of the district is provided in section 2
410 and this section.
411 (b) The powers, functions, and duties of the district
412 regarding ad valorem taxation, bond issuance, other revenue-
413 raising capabilities, budget preparation and approval, liens and
414 foreclosure of liens, use of tax deeds and tax certificates as
415 appropriate for non-ad valorem assessments, and contractual
416 agreements are provided in section 6.
417 (c) The methods for establishing the district are
418 provided in this section.
419 (d) The methods for amending the charter of the district
420 are provided in this section.
421 (e) The membership and organization of the governing body
422 and the establishment of a quorum are provided in section 5.
423 (f) The maximum compensation of board members is provided
424 in section 5.
425 (g) The administrative duties of the governing body are
Page 17 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
426 provided in sections 5 and 6.
427 (h) The requirements for financial disclosure, noticing,
428 and reporting are provided in section 6.
429 (i) The procedures and requirements for issuing bonds are
430 provided in section 6.
431 (j) The requirements for elections or referendums and
432 qualifications of an elector of the district are provided in
433 section 5.
434 (k) The methods for financing the district are provided
435 in section 6.
436 (l) Other than taxes levied for the payment of bonds and
437 taxes levied for periods of up to 2 years when authorized by a
438 vote of the electors of the district, the authority to levy ad
439 valorem tax and the authorized millage rate are provided in
440 section 6.
441 (m) The methods for collecting non-ad valorem
442 assessments, fees, or service charges are provided in section 6.
443 (n) The requirements for planning are provided in
444 sections 2 and 6.
445 (o) The geographic boundary limitations of the district
446 are provided in sections 4 and 6.
447 (2) The Land Reserve Stewardship District is created and
448 incorporated as a public body corporate and politic, an
449 independent special and limited purpose local government, an
450 independent special district, under s. 189.031, Florida
Page 18 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
451 Statutes, and as defined in this act and in s. 189.012(3),
452 Florida Statutes, in and for portions of Hillsborough County.
453 Any amendments to chapter 190, Florida Statutes, after January
454 1, 2026, granting additional general powers, special powers,
455 authorities, or projects to a community development district by
456 amendment to its uniform charter contained in ss. 190.006-
457 190.041, Florida Statutes, which are not inconsistent with this
458 act, shall constitute a general power, special power, authority,
459 or function of the Land Reserve Stewardship District. All
460 notices for the enactment by the Legislature of this special act
461 have been provided pursuant to the State Constitution, the Laws
462 of Florida, and the rules of the House of Representatives and of
463 the Senate. A referendum subsequent to the effective date of
464 this act is not required as a condition of establishing the
465 district. Therefore, the district, as created by this act, is
466 established on the property described in this act.
467 (3) The territorial boundary of the district shall
468 embrace and include all of that certain real property described
469 in section 4.
470 (4) The jurisdiction of the district, in the exercise of
471 its general and special powers, and in the carrying out of its
472 special and limited purposes, is both within the external
473 boundaries of the legal description of this district and
474 extraterritorially when limited to, and as authorized expressly
475 elsewhere in, the charter of the district as created in this act
Page 19 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
476 or applicable general law. This special and limited purpose
477 district is created as a public body corporate and politic, and
478 local government authority and power is limited by its charter,
479 this act, and subject to other general laws, including chapter
480 189, Florida Statutes, except that an inconsistent provision in
481 this act shall control and the district has jurisdiction to
482 perform such acts and exercise such authorities, functions, and
483 powers as shall be necessary, convenient, incidental, proper, or
484 reasonable for the implementation of its special and limited
485 purpose regarding the sound planning, provision, acquisition,
486 development, operation, maintenance, and related financing of
487 those public systems, facilities, services, improvements,
488 projects, and infrastructure works as authorized herein,
489 including those necessary and incidental thereto. The district
490 shall only exercise any of its powers extraterritorially within
491 Hillsborough County after execution of an interlocal agreement
492 between the district and Hillsborough County consenting to the
493 district's exercise of any of such powers within Hillsborough
494 County or an applicable development order or as part of other
495 land development regulations issued by Hillsborough County.
496 (5) The exclusive charter of the Land Reserve Stewardship
497 District is this act and, except as otherwise provided in
498 subsection (2), may be amended only by special act of the
499 Legislature.
500 Section 4. Formation; boundaries.—The Land Reserve
Page 20 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
501 Stewardship District, an independent special district, is
502 created and incorporated in Hillsborough County and shall
503 embrace and include the territory described as:
504
505 TECO PARCELS:
506
507 PARCEL 1:
508
509 The South 320 feet of Section 31, Township 32 South, Range
510 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, LESS AND EXCEPT that
511 part taken for State Road 93A (I-75) as described in the
512 Order of Taking recorded in Official Records Book 3296,
513 Page 1932, Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
514
515 PARCEL 2:
516
517 The South 320 feet of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 32,
518 Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County,
519 Florida.
520
521 FARMLAND PARCELS:
522
523 PARCEL 1:
524
525 PARCEL A:
Page 21 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
526
527 The Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4, the Southeast 1/4
528 of the Northwest 1/4, and a portion of the Northeast 1/4 of
529 the Northwest 1/4 all in Section 25, Township 32 South,
530 Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, being more
531 particularly described as follows:
532
533 Commence at the Northeast corner of the Northeast 1/4 of
534 the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25; thence S 00°10'55" W
535 along the East line of said Northeast 1/4 of the Northwest
536 1/4 for 33.00 feet to a point on the South right-of-way
537 line of Stephens Road (as recorded in Deed Book 2022, Page
538 578 of the Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida)
539 and the POINT OF BEGINNING; thence continue S 00°10'55" W
540 along said East line for 1304.06 feet; thence S 00°11'19" W
541 along the East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest
542 1/4 of said Section 25 for 1337.48 feet; thence S 89°58'08"
543 W along the South line of the Southeast 1/4 of the
544 Northwest 1/4 of Section 25 for 1333.64 feet; thence S
545 89°59'26" W along the South line of the Southwest 1/4 of
546 the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25 for 1333.41 feet;
547 thence N 00°07'05" E along the West line of the Southwest
548 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 25 for 1338.35 feet;
549 thence N 89°59'55" E along the North line of the Southwest
550 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25 for 1334.25
Page 22 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
551 feet; thence N 00°09'15" E along the West line of the
552 Northeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25 for
553 461.86 feet; thence N 48°48'19" E for 487.22 feet; thence N
554 58°21'54" W for 425.36 feet to a point of intersection with
555 a line 3.00 feet East of and parallel with the West line of
556 the Northeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25;
557 thence N 00°09'15" E along said parallel line for 298.84
558 feet to the South right-of-way of Stephens Road; thence S
559 89°58'25" E along said South right-of-way line for 1332.08
560 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING.
561
562 LESS AND EXCEPT ANY PORTION THEREOF CONTAINED IN THE
563 FOLLOWING:
564
565 SCHOOL SITE:
566
567 A parcel of land being a portion of the Northwest 1/4 of
568 Section 26, the Northeast 1/4 of Section 26 and the
569 Northwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 32 South, Range 18
570 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, being more particularly
571 described as follows:
572 BEGIN at the Northeast corner of said Section 26; thence S
573 00°07'05" W along the East line of the Northeast 1/4 of
574 said Section 26 for 1338.35 feet to the Northwest corner of
575 the Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25;
Page 23 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
576 thence N 89°59'55" E along the North line of the Southwest
577 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25 for 625.70
578 feet; thence S 00°00'05" E for 361.36 feet; thence S
579 29°06'53" W for 1118.29 feet to a point on the South line
580 of the Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section
581 25; thence S 89°59'26" W along said South line for 84.35
582 feet to the Southeast corner of the Northeast 1/4 of said
583 Section 26; thence along the South line of the Northeast
584 1/4 of said Section 26, S 89°55'06" W for 2688.33 feet to
585 the Southwest corner of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section
586 26; thence continue along the South line of the Northwest
587 1/4 of said Section 26 for 1929.14 feet; thence N 30°45'07"
588 E for 1316.45 feet; thence N 00°05'08" W for 212.18 feet to
589 a point on the North line of the Southeast 1/4 of the
590 Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26; thence N 89°54'52" E
591 along said North line for 1262.65 feet to the Northeast
592 corner of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section
593 26; thence N 00°16'11" E along the West line of the
594 Northeast 1/4 of said Section 26 for 1342.67 feet to the
595 Northwest corner of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 26;
596 thence S 89°53'52" E along the North line of the Northeast
597 1/4 of said Section 26 for 2681.20 feet to the POINT OF
598 BEGINNING.
599
600 PARCEL B:
Page 24 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
601
602 The Northwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 25,
603 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, Tallahassee Meridian,
604 lying and being in Hillsborough County, Florida. LESS AND
605 EXCEPT right-of-way for Stephens Road.
606
607 PARCEL C:
608
609 The Southwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 25,
610 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, Tallahassee Meridian,
611 lying and being in Hillsborough County, Florida.
612
613 PARCEL D:
614
615 The Northwest 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 25,
616 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, Tallahassee Meridian,
617 lying and being in Hillsborough County, Florida.
618
619 PARCEL E:
620
621 The Southwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 32 South, Range
622 18 East, Tallahassee Meridian, lying and being in
623 Hillsborough County, Florida.
624
625 PARCEL 2:
Page 25 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
626
627 PARCEL A:
628
629 THE SOUTH 1/2 OF SECTION 26, TOWNSHIP 32 SOUTH, RANGE 18
630 EAST, HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY, FLORIDA.
631
632 PARCEL B:
633
634 THAT PORTION OF SECTION 27, TOWNSHIP 32 SOUTH, RANGE 18
635 EAST, HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY, FLORIDA, MORE PARTICULARLY
636 DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
637
638 BEGIN AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF STATED SECTION 27 FOR A
639 POINT OF BEGINNING; THENCE, SOUTH 89°09'25" WEST ALONG THE
640 SOUTH BOUNDARY OF SECTION 27, A DISTANCE OF 3252.07 FEET;
641 THENCE NORTH 54°55'27" EAST A DISTANCE OF 3381.55 FEET;
642 THENCE NORTH 35°04'33" WEST A DISTANCE OF 1125.00 FEET TO A
643 POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST RIGHT-OF-WAY BOUNDARY OF HIGHWAY
644 U.S. 41 (STATE ROAD NO. 45); THENCE N 54°55'27" EAST ALONG
645 STATED RIGHT-OF-WAY BOUNDARY A DISTANCE OF 1381.08 FEET TO
646 A POINT ON THE EAST BOUNDARY OF SECTION 27; THENCE SOUTH
647 00°17'04" EAST ALONG THE EAST BOUNDARY OF SECTION 27 A
648 DISTANCE OF 924.79 FEET TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE
649 SOUTHEAST 1/4 OF SECTION 27, THENCE SOUTH 00°05'13" WEST
650 ALONG THE EAST BOUNDARY OF SECTION 27, A DISTANCE OF
Page 26 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
651 2684.95 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SECTION 27 AND THE
652 POINT OF BEGINNING.
653
654 PARCEL 3:
655
656 That part of the West 660.0 feet of the Southwest 1/4 of
657 the Northwest 1/4 of Section 26, Township 32 South, Range
658 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying South and East
659 of U.S. Highway 41, being more particularly described as
660 follows:
661 BEGIN at the Southwest corner of the Southwest 1/4 of the
662 Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26; thence N 00°15'11" E
663 along the West line of said Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest
664 1/4 for 922.31 feet to a point on the Southeasterly right-
665 of-way line of U.S. Highway 41 (State Road 45, Section No.
666 10060-2505); thence N 55°29'22" E along said Southeasterly
667 right-of-way line for 743.24 feet to a point on the North
668 line of said Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4; thence N
669 89°54'52" E along said North line for 49.42 feet to a point
670 of intersection with a line 660 feet East of and parallel
671 with the West line of said Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest
672 1/4; thence S 00°15'11" W along said parallel line for
673 1342.53 feet to a point on the South line of said Southwest
674 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4; thence S 89°55'06" W the said
675 South line for 660.01 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING.
Page 27 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
676
677 AND
678
679 The Northeast 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest
680 1/4, the Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4, and that
681 portion of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 lying
682 South and East of U.S. Highway 41, all in Section 26,
683 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, in. Hillsborough County,
684 Florida, LESS the West 660.00 feet of the Southwest 1/4 of
685 the Northwest 1/4 lying South and East of U.S. Highway 41
686 in said Section 26, being more particularly described as
687 follows:
688
689 BEGIN at the Northeast corner of said Section 26; thence S
690 00°07'05" W along the East line of the Northeast 1/4 of
691 said Section 26 for 2676.70 feet; thence S 89°55'06" W
692 along the South line of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section
693 26 for 2688.33 feet; thence continue S 89°55'06" W along
694 the South line of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26 for
695 2017.54 feet to a point of intersection with a line 660.00
696 feet East of and parallel with the West line of the
697 Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26;
698 thence N 00°15'11" E along said parallel line for 1342.53
699 feet to a point on the North line of the Southwest 1/4 of
700 the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26; thence S 89°54'52" W
Page 28 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
701 along said North line for 49.42 feet to a point on the
702 Southeasterly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 41 (State
703 Road 45, Section No. 10060-2505); thence Northeasterly
704 along right-of-way line for the following (2) courses: 1) N
705 55°29'22" E for 544.02 feet to a point of curvature; 2)
706 Northeasterly along the arc of a curve concave
707 Northwesterly, having for its elements a radius of 3951.72
708 feet, a central angle of 05°08'37", an arc length of 354.76
709 feet, and a chord bearing and distance of N 52°55'03" E for
710 354.65 feet to a point of intersection with the West line
711 of the Northeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section
712 26; thence S 00°16'31" W along said West line for 520.98
713 feet; thence N 89°54'52" E along the South line of the
714 Northeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26 for
715 1338.65 feet; thence N 00°16'11" E along the East line of
716 the Northeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26
717 for 1342.67 feet; thence S 89°53'52" E along the North line
718 of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 26 for 2681.20 feet to
719 the POINT OF BEGINNING.
720
721 LESS AND EXCEPT ANY PORTION THEREOF CONTAINED IN THE
722 FOLLOWING:
723
724 SCHOOL SITE
725
Page 29 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
726 A parcel of land being a portion of the Northwest 1/4 of
727 Section 26, the Northeast 1/4 of Section 26 and the
728 Northwest 1/4 of Section 25, Township 32 South, Range 18
729 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, being more particularly
730 described as follows:
731 BEGIN at the Northeast corner of said Section 26; thence S
732 00°07'05" W along the East line of the Northeast 1/4 of
733 said Section 26 for 1338.35 feet to the Northwest corner of
734 the Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25;
735 thence N 89°59'55" E along the North line of the Southwest
736 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section 25 for 625.70
737 feet; thence S 00°00'05" E for 361.36 feet; thence S
738 29°06'53" W for 1118.29 feet to a point on the South line
739 of the Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of said Section
740 25; thence S 89°59'26" W along said South line for 84.35
741 feet to the Southeast corner of the Northeast 1/4 of said
742 Section 26; thence along the South line of the Northeast
743 1/4 of said Section 26, S 89°55'06" W for 2688.33 feet to
744 the Southwest corner of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section
745 26; thence continue along the South line of the Northwest
746 1/4 of said Section 26 for 1929.14 feet; thence N 30°45'07"
747 E for 1316.45 feet; thence N 00°05'08" W for 212.18 feet to
748 a point on the North line of the Southeast 1/4 of the
749 Northwest 1/4 of said Section 26; thence N 89°54'52" E
750 along said North line for 1262.65 feet to the Northeast
Page 30 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
751 corner of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section
752 26; thence N 00°16'11" E along the West line of the
753 Northeast 1/4 of said Section 26 for 1342.67 feet to the
754 Northwest corner of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 26;
755 thence S 89°53'52" E along the North line of the Northeast
756 1/4 of said Section 26 for 2681.20 feet to the POINT OF
757 BEGINNING.
758
759 PARCEL 4:
760
761 The Southwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 26,
762 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, of the Tallahassee
763 Meridian, lying North and West of United States Highway No.
764 41.
765
766 AND
767
768 All that part of Section 27, Township 32 South, Range 18
769 East of the Tallahassee Meridian, lying between the rights-
770 of-way of the Atlantic Coast Line Railroad and the United
771 States Highway No. 41.
772
773 AND
774
775 That part of the Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of
Page 31 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
776 Section 26, Township 32 South, Range 18 East of the
777 Tallahassee Meridian lying North and West of U.S. Highway
778 No. 41, LESS a parcel of land described as follows: Begin
779 on the North line of said Northwest 1/4 of the Northwest
780 1/4 at the intersection of said line and the Southerly line
781 of the railroad right-of-way, thence East along said North
782 line to the Northeast corner of the Northwest 1/4 of the
783 Northwest 1/4, thence South to the U.S. Highway No. 41
784 right-of-way, thence Southwesterly along the highway right
785 of-way 760.00 feet, thence North 45 degrees West to the
786 railroad right-of-way, thence Northeasterly to the Point of
787 Beginning.
788
789 LESS that part Northwesterly of the railroad right-of-way.
790
791 The above-described property also being described as
792 follows:
793
794 For a point of reference, commence at the Southeast corner
795 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 27, Township 32 South,
796 Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida N 0 deg 08 min
797 34 Sec East, along the East boundary of the Northeast 1/4
798 of said Section 27, a distance of 1136.11 feet to a point
799 on the Northerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway NO. 41
800 for the Point of Beginning. Run thence S 55 deg 26'42" W.,
Page 32 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
801 along the Northerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway No.
802 41, a distanced of 4532.18 feet to the P.C. of a curve to
803 the left having a radius of 28,697.90 feet; thence along
804 the Northerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway No. 41, a
805 distance of 60.87 feet along the arc of said curve, thru a
806 central angle of 0 deg 07'17", a chord bearing and distance
807 of S 55 deg 23'03" W., 60.87 feet to a point on the
808 Southerly right-of-way line of the Seaboard Coast Line
809 Railroad; thence N. 53 deg 17'38" E., along the Southerly
810 right-of-way line said Railroad, a distance of 1408.83 feet
811 to the P.C. of a curve to the left having a radius of
812 5729.58 feet and a central angle of 08 deg 30'00"; thence
813 along the Southerly right-of-way line of said Railroad,
814 850.00 feet along the arc of said curve, a chord bearing
815 and distance of N. 49 deg 02'38" E., 849.22 feet to the
816 P.T. of said curve; thence N. 44 deg 47'38" E, along the
817 Southerly right-of-way line of said Railroad, a distance of
818 3314.56 feet; thence S 52 deg 30'43" E., a distance of
819 750.35 feet to a point on the Northerly right-of-way line
820 of U.S. Highway No. 41; said point being on a curve to the
821 right having a radius of 1859.86 feet; thence along the
822 Northerly right of way line of U.S. Highway No. 41, a
823 distance of 415.95 feet along the arc of said curve, thru a
824 central angle of 12 deg 48'51", a chord bearing and
825 distance of S. 49 deg 02'17" W., 415.09 feet to the P.T. of
Page 33 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
826 said curve; thence S 55 deg 26'42" W., along the Northerly
827 right-of-way line of U.S. Highway No; 41 a distance of
828 735.01 feet to the Point of Beginning.
829
830 All lying and being in Sections 26 and 27, Township 32
831 South, Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida.
832
833 PARCEL 5:
834
835 That part of Section 27, Township 32 South, Range 18 East,
836 Hillsborough County, Florida, lying North and West of the
837 Atlantic Coast Line Railroad right-of-way;
838
839 LESS road right-of-way;
840
841 ALSO LESS a tract in the SW 1/4 of the said Section 27,
842 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, described as follows:
843 From the Southwest corner of said Section 27, run North
844 1°52.5' East along the West boundary of Section 27 a
845 distance of 229.0 feet to intersection with the Northern
846 right of way line of Atlantic Coast Line Railroad for a
847 Point of Beginning; from said Point of Beginning run North
848 54°34' East said Atlantic Coast Line Railroad right of way
849 a distance of 808.25 feet to a point North 35°26' West 65.0
850 feet from the center of an existing grade crossing of the
Page 34 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
851 Atlantic Coast Line Railroad; run thence North 1°52.5' East
852 1197.0 feet; run thence North 43°18' West 906.45 feet to a
853 point on the West boundary of said Section 27; run thence
854 South 1°52.5' West 2325.87 feet along the West boundary of
855 said Section 27 to the Point of Beginning;
856
857 ALSO LESS the following:
858
859 That part lying North and East of the Southwesterly
860 boundary of road conveyed to Hillsborough County in
861 Official Record Book 1015 at page 11.
862
863 AND
864
865 That part of NW 1/4 of NW 1/4 of Section 26, Township 32
866 South, Range 18 East, lying North and West of railroad, and
867 South and West of road conveyed to Hillsborough County in
868 Official Record Book 1015 at page 11.
869
870 PARCEL 6:
871
872 Tract beginning at the Northeast corner of Section 28,
873 Township 32 South, Range 18 East, and run South 500 feet;
874 thence run West 2660 feet to the mean high water mark of
875 Cockroach Bay; thence run Northeasterly along the mean high
Page 35 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
876 water mark of Cockroach Bay to the North Section line of
877 Section 28, Township 32 South, Range 18 East; thence run
878 East along the said North Section line of the said Section
879 28 to the Point of Beginning.
880
881 PARCEL 7:
882
883 That part of Sections 34, 35, and 36, Township 32 South,
884 Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying North of
885 the Northerly right of way line of a road designated
886 "Boulevard", on the plat of LES JARDINS DE FLORIDE
887 SUBDIVISION, which is a dedicated County road; and that
888 part of Section 33, Township 32 South, Range 18 East,
889 Hillsborough County, Florida, lying East of U.S. Highway
890 No. 41 and North of the above referenced dedicated County
891 road.
892
893 LESS the North 660 feet thereof, conveyed to Tampa Electric
894 Company by that Warranty Deed recorded in Official Record
895 Book 3184 at Page 1092, of the Public Records of
896 Hillsborough County, Florida.
897
898 ALSO LESS the parcel conveyed to Tampa Electric Company as
899 recorded in Official Record Book 4323 at Page 297, of the
900 Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
Page 36 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
901
902 ALSO LESS that portion conveyed to Hillsborough County by
903 that Warranty Deed recorded in Official Records Book 3770,
904 Page 1105, of the Public Records of Hillsborough County,
905 Florida.
906 ALSO LESS additional right of way for Valroy Road.
907
908 All the forgoing lands constitute a part of the LES JARDINS
909 DE FLORIDE SUBDIVISION, as per plat thereof recorded in
910 Plat Book 1 at Page 150, of the Public Records of
911 Hillsborough County, Florida.
912
913 PARCEL 8:
914
915 The Southerly portion of Section 34, Township 32 South,
916 Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; lying South of
917 Valroy Road, being a 100-foot right-of-way, and running in
918 an East-West direction through the approximate middle of
919 said Section 34;
920
921 LESS any other road right-of-way;
922
923 ALSO LESS the South 660.00 feet thereof;
924
925 ALSO LESS the West 1905.36 feet thereof;
Page 37 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
926
927 ALSO LESS OUTPARCEL DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS: That part of the
928 Southwest 1/4 of Section 34, Township 32 South, Range 18
929 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, being more particularly
930 described as follows: Commence at the West 1/4 corner of
931 Section 34, Township 32 South, Range 18 East, Hillsborough
932 County, Florida; thence South 89°55'43" East, along the
933 East/West centerline of said Section 34, for 1906.65 feet;
934 thence South 00°11'42" West for 50.00 feet, to the Southern
935 right-of-way of aforesaid Valroy Road and the Point of
936 Beginning; thence South 89°55'43" East, along said southern
937 right-of-way, for 123.78 feet; thence South 00°05'21" West
938 for 135.00 feet; thence North 89°55'43" West for 124.03
939 feet; thence North 00°11'42" East for 135.00 feet to the
940 Point of Beginning.
941
942 PARCEL 9:
943
944 PARCEL A:
945
946 Tracts 39 through 45, inclusive, LESS the North 200 feet
947 thereof; Tracts 48 through 57, inclusive, and that portion
948 of Tract 46, less the north 200 feet thereof, Tract 47, and
949 Garden Tracts 29, 32, 33, 34 and 35 lying East and South of
950 the present location of Bayshore Road (US Highway No. 541
Page 38 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
951 (41)) of Les Jardins de Floride, according to the map or
952 plat thereof, as recorded in Plat Book 1, Page 150, of the
953 Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida, all lying
954 and being a part of Sections 32 and 33, Township 32 South,
955 Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida.
956
957 Excepting therefrom the South 660 feet of the above
958 described land.
959
960 PARCEL B: (WELL PARCEL)
961
962 Commence at the Southeast corner of Section 33, Township 32
963 South, Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; thence
964 North 00°10'22" East, along the East line of said Section
965 33, a distance of 660.46 feet to a TECO Monument found
966 marking the North line of the South 660 feet of said
967 Section 33 as monumented; thence South 89°45'19" West,
968 25.00 feet to a point on the West line of a 50 foot wide
969 platted right-of-way as shown on the Plat of Les Jardins de
970 Floride, according to the map or plat thereof, as recorded
971 in Plat Book 1, Page 150, of the Public Records of
972 Hillsborough County, Florida; thence continue South
973 89°45'19" West, 1064.89 feet for a Point of Beginning;
974 thence continue South 89°45'19" West, 30.00 feet; thence
975 South 00°14'41" East, 65.00 feet; thence North 89°45'19"
Page 39 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
976 East, 30.00 feet; thence North 00°14'41" West, 65.00 feet
977 to the Point of Beginning.
978
979 PARCEL C:
980
981 The Westerly 25 feet of that certain 50 foot wide right-of-
982 way as shown on the Plat entitled "Les Jardins de Floride"
983 recorded in Plat Book 1, Page 150, of the Public Records of
984 Hillsborough County, Florida which lies East of and
985 adjacent to the East line of Tract 39, Less the North 200
986 feet thereof, and the East line of Tract 57, Less the South
987 660 feet thereof, all of said plat.
988
989 Being more particularly described as follows:
990
991 Commence at the Southeast corner of Section 33, Township 32
992 South, Range 18 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; thence
993 North 00°10'22" East, along the East line of said Section
994 33, a distance of 660.46 feet to a TECO monument found
995 marking the North line of the South 660 feet of said
996 Section 33 as monumented, said point being the Point of
997 Beginning; thence continue North 00°10'22" East, along the
998 East line of said section, a distance of 956.20 feet;
999 thence leaving the East line of said section South
1000 89°58'38" West, a distance of 25.00 feet to the East line
Page 40 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1001 of said Tract 39; thence South 00°10'22" West along the
1002 East line of said Tracts 39 and 57, a distance of 956.29
1003 feet; thence North 89°45'19" East, a distance of 25.00 feet
1004 to the Point of Beginning.
1005
1006 SUBURBAN LAND PARCELS:
1007
1008 PARCEL 1:
1009
1010 THE N 660 FT OF THAT PT OF NE 1/4 OF SECTION 33, TOWNSHIP
1011 32 SOUTH, RANGE 18 EAST, HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY, FLORIDA,
1012 LYING EAST OF R/W OF US HWY 41.
1013
1014 PARCEL 2:
1015
1016 THE N 660 FEET OF SECTION 34, TOWNSHIP 32 SOUTH, RANGE 18
1017 EAST, HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY, FLORIDA, LESS R/W FOR US HWY 41.
1018
1019 PARCEL 3:
1020
1021 THE N 660 FT OF SECTION 35, TOWNSHIP 32 SOUTH, RANGE 18
1022 EAST, HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY, FLORIDA.
1023
1024 PARCEL 4:
1025
Page 41 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1026 THE N 660 FT OF SECTION 36, TOWNSHIP 32 SOUTH, RANGE 18
1027 EAST, HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY, FLORIDA.
1028
1029 PARCEL 5:
1030
1031 The North 100 acres of the South 300 acres of the West 1/2
1032 of Section 32, Township 32 South, Range 19 East,
1033 Hillsborough County, Florida; LESS the South 235 feet of
1034 the North 665 thereof and LESS existing road rights of way
1035 and LESS right of way for I-75.
1036
1037 ALSO LESS AND EXCEPT any portion thereof contained in
1038 Special Warranty Deed recorded in Official Records
1039 Instrument Number 2024282551, Public Records of
1040 Hillsborough County, Florida.
1041
1042 PARCEL 6:
1043
1044 The South 200 acres of the West 1/2 of Section 32, Township
1045 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; LESS
1046 the South 320 feet thereof and LESS existing road rights of
1047 way.
1048
1049 ALSO LESS AND EXCEPT any portion thereof contained in
1050 Special Warranty Deed recorded in Official Records
Page 42 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1051 Instrument Number 2024282551, Public Records of
1052 Hillsborough County, Florida.
1053
1054 PARCEL 7:
1055
1056 That part of the West 1/2 of Section 32, Township 32 South,
1057 Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying East of
1058 the Easterly right of way line of I-75, LESS the South 300
1059 acres thereof.
1060
1061 ALSO LESS AND EXCEPT any portion thereof contained in
1062 Special Warranty Deed recorded in Official Records
1063 Instrument Number 2024282551, Public Records of
1064 Hillsborough County, Florida.
1065
1066 PARCEL 8:
1067
1068 Begin at a point that is the intersection of the West line
1069 of Section 31, Township 32 South, Range 19 East,
1070 Hillsborough County, Florida, with the Northwesterly right
1071 of way line of I-75; thence North along the said West line
1072 of Section 31, to a point of intersection of said West line
1073 of Section 31 with the Southerly right of way line of
1074 Valroy Road; thence Northeasterly along the said Southerly
1075 right of way line of Valroy Road to a point which is the
Page 43 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1076 intersection of said Southerly right of way line of Valroy
1077 Road with said Northwesterly right of way line of I-75;
1078 thence go Southwesterly along the said Northwesterly right
1079 of way line of I-75 to the Point of Beginning.
1080
1081 PARCEL 9:
1082
1083 Begin at a point that is the intersection of the Northerly
1084 boundary of Valroy Road and the Westerly boundary of I-75
1085 in the East 1/2 of Section 31, Township 32 South, Range 19
1086 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, thence Northeasterly
1087 along the Westerly boundary of I-75, 700 feet, more or
1088 less, to the intersection of the Westerly boundary of I-75
1089 and the South boundary of the 660 foot easement of Tampa
1090 Electric Company; thence West along the South boundary of
1091 said Tampa Electric easement a distance of 1750 feet, more
1092 or less, to a point in an existing fence line; thence South
1093 along said fence line a distance of 750 feet, more or less,
1094 to a point of intersection of said fence line and the
1095 Northerly boundary of Valroy Road; thence Easterly
1096 following the Northerly boundary of Valroy Road a distance
1097 of 1435 feet, more or less, to the Point of Beginning;
1098 TOGETHER with an easement for ingress and egress as
1099 reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page 500
1100 and easement for ingress and egress as reserved in O.R.
Page 44 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1101 Book 2723, Page 494, Public Records of Hillsborough County,
1102 Florida. Together with an easement for ingress and egress
1103 as reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1104 494, AS ASSIGNED IN O.R. BOOK 17859, PAGE 1277, Public
1105 Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1106
1107 LESS AND EXCEPT those lands contained in Special Warranty
1108 Deed recorded in Official Records Instrument Number
1109 2024282552, Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1110
1111 PARCEL 10:
1112
1113 That part of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 31, Township 32
1114 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying
1115 East of the Easterly right of way line of I-75 and North of
1116 the Northerly right of way line of Valroy Road; LESS that
1117 portion conveyed to Tampa Electric Company by virtue of
1118 deed recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page 500, Public Records
1119 of Hillsborough County, Florida; Together with an easement
1120 for ingress and egress as reserved in instrument recorded
1121 in O.R. Book 2723, Page 494, Public Records of Hillsborough
1122 County, Florida.
1123
1124 PARCEL 11:
1125
Page 45 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1126 Begin at a point on the East line of Section 31, Township
1127 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; said
1128 point being 320 feet North of the Southeast corner of said
1129 Section 31; thence go West parallel to the South line of
1130 said Section 31, 1900 feet to a point; thence go North
1131 parallel to the East line of said Section 31, 900 feet to a
1132 point; thence go East parallel to the South line of said
1133 Section 31, 700 feet to a point; thence go Northeasterly
1134 1700 feet to a point that is 250 feet West of the East line
1135 of said Section 31, thence go East parallel to the South
1136 line of said Section 31, East 250 feet, more or less, to
1137 the East line of said Section 31, thence South along the
1138 East line of said Section 31, 2200 feet, more or less, to
1139 the Point of Beginning.
1140
1141 PARCEL 12:
1142
1143 (a) That portion of Section 31, Township 32 South, Range
1144 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying Southeasterly
1145 of I-75 and South of Valroy Road; LESS the South 320 feet
1146 and LESS Tract beginning at a point on the East line of
1147 Section 31, Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough
1148 County, Florida; said point being 320 feet North of the
1149 Southeast corner of said Section 31; thence go West
1150 parallel to the South line of said Section 31, 1900 feet to
Page 46 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1151 a point; thence go North parallel to the East line of said
1152 Section 31, 900 feet to a point; thence go East parallel to
1153 the South line of said Section 31, 700 feet to a point;
1154 thence go Northeasterly 1700 feet to a point that is 250
1155 feet West of the East line of said Section 31, thence go
1156 East parallel to the South line of said Section 31, East
1157 250 feet, more or less, to the East line of said Section
1158 31, thence South along the East line of said Section 31,
1159 2200 feet, more or less, to the Point of Beginning;
1160 Together with an easement for ingress and egress as
1161 reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1162 494, Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1163 Together with an easement for ingress and egress as
1164 reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1165 494, AS ASSIGNED IN O.R. BOOK 17859, PAGE 1277, Public
1166 Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1167
1168 AND
1169
1170 (b) Beginning at the intersection of the Northerly road
1171 right of way of Valroy Road and the West line of Section
1172 31, Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County,
1173 Florida; thence go North along the West line of said
1174 Section 31 a distance of 1400 feet more or less to the
1175 South boundary of the lands of Tampa Electric Company,
Page 47 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1176 thence go Northeasterly 935 feet, more or less, to the
1177 South boundary of the 660 foot parcel owned by TECO, thence
1178 go East 2550 feet more or less to the East line of fence on
1179 Ganey Road, thence go South 760 feet, more or less, to the
1180 Northerly right of way of Valroy Road, thence Southwesterly
1181 along the Northerly right of way line of Valroy Road to the
1182 Point of Beginning; LESS and except therefrom the West 100
1183 feet of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 31, lying and
1184 situated within the boundaries of the just described
1185 property.
1186 Less and Except that portion thereof having been conveyed
1187 to Tampa Electric Company by deed recorded in Official
1188 Records Book 4351, Page 440, Public Records of Hillsborough
1189 County, Florida.
1190
1191 AND
1192
1193 (c) The Southeast 1/4 of Section 30, Township 32 South,
1194 Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying
1195 Southerly and Easterly of the Little Manatee River less and
1196 except the following parcels described in A, B and C:
1197
1198 (A) A parcel of land lying and being in the Southeast 1/4
1199 of Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19 East,
1200 Hillsborough County, Florida, more particularly described
Page 48 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1201 as follows:
1202
1203 Begin at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4 of said
1204 Section 30; thence North 89°46'34" East, along the North
1205 line of said Southeast 1/4; a distance of 756.08 feet;
1206 thence South 38°45'41" East, 471.11 feet; thence South
1207 40°18'11" East, 993.65 feet; thence South 01°26'27" West,
1208 818.10 feet; thence South 82°12'36" West, 1664.03 feet to a
1209 point on the West line of said Southeast 1/4; thence North
1210 00°38'54" West, along said West line, a distance of 2165.72
1211 feet to the Point of Beginning; LESS the West 100 feet
1212 thereof.
1213
1214 (B) The West 100 feet of said Southeast 1/4 of Section 30,
1215 Township 32 South, Range 19 East. Together with an easement
1216 for ingress and egress as reserved in instrument recorded
1217 in O.R. Book 2723, Page 494, AS ASSIGNED IN O.R. BOOK
1218 17859, PAGE 1277, Public Records of Hillsborough County,
1219 Florida.
1220
1221 (C) Commence at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4
1222 of Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19 East,
1223 Hillsborough County, Florida; thence North 89°46'34" East,
1224 along the North line of said Southeast 1/4, a distance of
1225 756.08 feet for a Point of Beginning; thence South
Page 49 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1226 38°45'41" East, 471.11 feet; thence North 47°29'30" East,
1227 324.89 feet to the waters of the Little Manatee River;
1228 thence North 17°27'13" West, along said waters, a distance
1229 of 156.96 feet to the aforementioned North line of the
1230 Southeast 1/4; thence South 89°46'34" West, along said
1231 North line, a distance of 487.38 feet to the Point of
1232 Beginning.
1233
1234 Also less and except that portion conveyed to Tampa
1235 Electric Company by virtue of instrument recorded in O.R.
1236 Book 2723, Page 500.
1237
1238 Together with an easement for ingress and egress as
1239 reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1240 500, and Together with an easement for ingress and egress
1241 described as follows:
1242 Commence at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4 of
1243 Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough
1244 County, Florida; thence run North 89°46'34" East, along the
1245 North line of said Southeast 1/4, a distance of 52.96 feet
1246 for a Point of Beginning; thence continue North 89°46'34"
1247 East, 703.12 feet; thence South 38°45'41" East, 63.92 feet;
1248 thence South 89°46'34" West, 741.73 feet; thence North
1249 01°37'19" West, 50.02 feet to the Point of Beginning.
1250
Page 50 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1251 PARCEL 13:
1252
1253 (a) Commence at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4
1254 of Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19 East,
1255 Hillsborough County, Florida; thence North 89°40'34" East,
1256 along the North line of said Southeast 1/4, a distance of
1257 756.08 feet for a Point of Beginning; thence South
1258 38°45'41" East, 471.11 feet; thence North 47°29'30" East,
1259 324.89 feet to the waters of the Little Manatee River;
1260 thence North 17°27'13" West, along said waters, a distance
1261 of 156.96 feet to the aforementioned North line of the
1262 Southeast 1/4; thence South 89°47'34" West, along said
1263 North line, a distance of 487.38 feet to the Point of
1264 Beginning; Together with an easement for ingress and
1265 egress, being more particularly described as follows:
1266 Commence at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4 of
1267 Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough
1268 County, Florida; thence North 89°46'34" East, along the
1269 North line of said Southeast 1/4, a distance of 52.96 feet
1270 for a Point of Beginning; thence continue North 89°46'34"
1271 East, 703.12 feet; thence South 38°45'41" East, 63.92 feet;
1272 thence South 89°40'34" West, 741.73 feet; thence North
1273 00°37'19" West, 50.02 feet to the Point of Beginning.
1274
1275 AND
Page 51 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1276
1277 (b) The West 100-feet of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 30,
1278 Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County,
1279 Florida TOGETHER with an easement for ingress and egress as
1280 reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1281 500, both of the Public Records of Hillsborough County,
1282 Florida.
1283
1284 AND
1285
1286 (c) The West 100 feet of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 31,
1287 Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County,
1288 Florida, lying North of Valroy Road and South of Tampa
1289 Electric Company tract described in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1290 494, Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1291
1292 PARCEL 14:
1293
1294 A parcel of land lying and being in the Southeast 1/4 of
1295 Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough
1296 County, Florida, more particularly described as follows:
1297
1298 Begin at the Northwest corner of the Southeast 1/4 of said
1299 Section 30; thence North 89°46'34" East, along the North
1300 line of said Southeast 1/4; a distance of 756.08 feet;
Page 52 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1301 thence South 38°45'41" East, 471.11 feet; thence South
1302 40°18'11" East, 993.65 feet; thence South 01°26'27" West,
1303 818.10 feet; thence South 82°12'36" West, 1664.03 feet to a
1304 point on the West line of said Southeast 1/4; thence North
1305 00°38'54" West, along said West line, a distance of 2165.72
1306 feet to the Point of Beginning; LESS the West 100 feet
1307 thereof.
1308
1309 PARCEL 15:
1310
1311 The Southwest 1/4 of Section 30, Township 32 South, Range
1312 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; Together with an
1313 easement for ingress and egress, being more particularly
1314 described as follows: Begin at the Northeast corner of the
1315 Southwest 1/4 of Section 30, Township 32 South, Range 19
1316 East, Hillsborough County, Florida; thence North 89°46'34"
1317 East along the North line of the Southeast 1/4 a distance
1318 of 102.96 feet; thence South 00°38'54" East, a distance of
1319 75 feet; thence South 89°46'34" West, a distance of 102.96
1320 feet; thence North 00°38'54" West, along the East line of
1321 the Southwest 1/4, a distance of 75 feet to the Point of
1322 Beginning; Together with an easement for ingress and egress
1323 as reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1324 494, Public Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1325 Together with an easement for ingress and egress as
Page 53 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1326 reserved in instrument recorded in O.R. Book 2723, Page
1327 494, AS ASSIGNED IN O.R. BOOK 17859, PAGE 1277, Public
1328 Records of Hillsborough County, Florida.
1329
1330 PARCEL 16:
1331
1332 That part of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 29, Township 32
1333 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying
1334 East of the Easterly right of way of I-75 and lying South
1335 of Little Manatee River.
1336
1337 AND
1338
1339 That part of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 29, Township 32
1340 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, lying
1341 West of the Westerly right of way of I-75 and lying South
1342 of Little Manatee River; LESS that portion conveyed to
1343 Tampa Electric Company by virtue of instrument recorded in
1344 O.R. Book 2723, Page 500, Public Records of Hillsborough
1345 County, Florida.
1346
1347 ALSO LESS AND EXCEPT any portion thereof contained in
1348 Special Warranty Deed recorded in Official Records
1349 Instrument Number 2024282551, Public Records of
1350 Hillsborough County, Florida.
Page 54 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1351
1352 PARCEL 17:
1353
1354 Parcel "A"
1355
1356 That part of:
1357
1358 The South 235 feet of the North 665 feet of the Northwest
1359 1/4 of Section 32, Township 32 South Range 19 East,
1360 Hillsborough County, Florida, lying East of the East right
1361 of way line of State Road No. 93A (I75).
1362
1363 LESS AND EXCEPT any portion thereof contained in Special
1364 Warranty Deed recorded in Official Records Instrument
1365 Number 2024282551, Public Records of Hillsborough County,
1366 Florida.
1367
1368 AND
1369
1370 Parcel "B":
1371
1372 A Parcel of land lying within Section 31; Township 32
1373 South, Range 19 East, Hillsborough County, Florida, being a
1374 portion of those lands described as Parcel I in O.R. Book
1375 2723, Page 500 of the Public Records of Hillsborough
Page 55 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1376 County, Florida and being more particularly described as
1377 follows:
1378
1379 Commence at the Northeast corner of said Section 31, run
1380 thence South 00°16'28" East along the East line of said
1381 Section 31, a distance of 467.58 feet to a point of
1382 intersection with the Easterly right of way line of State
1383 Road 93A (I-75), said point being the Point of Beginning;
1384 thence continue South 00°16'28" East along the East line of
1385 said Section 31, a distance of 197.43 feet to the Southeast
1386 corner of the North 665 feet of the Northeast 1/4 of said
1387 Section 31; run thence North 89°42'13" West, a distance of
1388 102.37 feet along the South line of said North 665 feet, to
1389 a point of intersection with the Easterly right of way line
1390 of State Road 93A (I-75); run thence North 27°15'15" East
1391 along the Easterly line of State Road 93A (I-75) a distance
1392 of 221.49 to the Point of Beginning.
1393
1394 PARCEL 18:
1395
1396 A parcel of land being a portion of those lands described
1397 as "Parcel I" in O.R. Book 2723, Page 500, of the Public
1398 Records of Hillsborough County, Florida, lying within the
1399 Northwest 1/4 of Section 31, Township 32 South, Range 19
1400 East, and being more particularly described as follows:
Page 56 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1401
1402 Description:
1403
1404 Commence at the Northwest corner of Section 31, Township 32
1405 South, Range 19 East, run thence South 89°42'08" East,
1406 2617.61 along the North boundary of said Section 31, also
1407 being the North line of The Tampa Electric Company right of
1408 way, Parcel I, O.R. Book 2723, Page 500, to a Point of
1409 Beginning; thence continue along the North line of said
1410 Section 31, South 89°42'08" East, 100.00 feet; thence
1411 leaving the North line of said Section 31, South 00°00'00"
1412 West, 665.05 feet to the intersection with the South line
1413 of said Parcel I, O.R. Book 2723, Page 500; thence North
1414 89°42'13" West, 100.00 feet, along said South line; thence
1415 North 00°00'00" West, 665.05 feet to the Point of
1416 Beginning.
1417
1418 TOTAL AREA OR PROPERTY DESCRIBED HEREIN IS 3,707 ACRES,
1419 MORE OR LESS.
1420 Section 5. Board of supervisors; members and meetings;
1421 organization; powers; duties; terms of office; related election
1422 requirements.—
1423 (1) The board of the district shall exercise the powers
1424 granted to the district pursuant to this act. The board shall
1425 consist of five members, each of whom shall hold office for a
Page 57 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1426 term of 4 years, as provided in this section, except as
1427 otherwise provided herein for initial board members, and until a
1428 successor is chosen and qualified. The members of the board must
1429 be residents of the state and citizens of the United States.
1430 (2)(a) Within 90 days after the effective date of this
1431 act, there shall be held a meeting of the landowners of the
1432 district for the purpose of electing five supervisors for the
1433 district. Notice of the landowners' meeting shall be published
1434 in a newspaper of general circulation in the general area of the
1435 district once a week for 2 consecutive weeks, the last day of
1436 such publication to be not fewer than 14 days nor more than 28
1437 days before the date of the election. The landowners, when
1438 assembled at such meeting, shall organize by electing a chair,
1439 who shall conduct the meeting. The chair may be any person
1440 present at the meeting. If the chair is a landowner or proxy
1441 holder of a landowner, he or she may nominate candidates and
1442 make and second motions. The landowners present at the meeting,
1443 in person or by proxy, shall constitute a quorum. At any
1444 landowners' meeting, 50 percent of the district acreage is not
1445 required to constitute a quorum, and each governing board member
1446 elected by landowners shall be elected by a majority of the
1447 acreage represented either by owner or proxy present and voting
1448 at said meeting.
1449 (b) At such meeting, each landowner shall be entitled to
1450 cast one vote per acre of land owned by him or her and located
Page 58 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1451 within the district for each person to be elected. A landowner
1452 may vote in person or by proxy in writing. Each proxy must be
1453 signed by one of the legal owners of the property for which the
1454 vote is cast and must contain the typed or printed name of the
1455 individual who signed the proxy; the street address, legal
1456 description of the property, or tax parcel identification
1457 number; and the number of authorized votes. If the proxy
1458 authorizes more than one vote, each property must be listed and
1459 the number of acres of each property must be included. The
1460 signature on a proxy need not be notarized. A fraction of an
1461 acre shall be treated as 1 acre, entitling the landowner to one
1462 vote with respect thereto. The three candidates receiving the
1463 highest number of votes shall each be elected for terms expiring
1464 November 26, 2030, and the two candidates receiving the next
1465 largest number of votes shall each be elected for terms expiring
1466 November 28, 2028, with the term of office for each successful
1467 candidate commencing upon election. The members of the first
1468 board elected by landowners shall serve their respective terms;
1469 however, the next election of board members shall be held on the
1470 first Tuesday after the first Monday in November 2028.
1471 Thereafter, there shall be an election by landowners for the
1472 district every 2 years on the first Tuesday after the first
1473 Monday in November, which shall be noticed pursuant to paragraph
1474 (a). The second and subsequent landowners' election shall be
1475 announced at a public meeting of the board at least 90 days
Page 59 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1476 before the date of the landowners' meeting and shall also be
1477 noticed pursuant to paragraph (a). Instructions on how all
1478 landowners may participate in the election, along with sample
1479 proxies, shall be provided during the board meeting that
1480 announces the landowners' meeting. Each supervisor elected in or
1481 after November 2028 shall serve a 4-year term.
1482 (3)(a)1. The board may not exercise the ad valorem taxing
1483 power authorized by this act until such time as all members of
1484 the board are qualified electors who are elected by qualified
1485 electors of the district.
1486 2.a. Regardless of whether the district has proposed to
1487 levy ad valorem taxes, board members shall be elected by
1488 qualified electors of the district as the district becomes
1489 populated with qualified electors. The transition shall occur
1490 such that the composition of the board, after the first general
1491 election following a trigger of the qualified elector population
1492 thresholds set forth below, shall be as follows:
1493 (I) Once 14,000 qualified electors reside within the
1494 district, one governing board member shall be a person who is a
1495 qualified elector of the district and who was elected by the
1496 qualified electors, and four governing board members shall be
1497 persons who were elected by the landowners.
1498 (II) Once 21,000 qualified electors reside within the
1499 district, two governing board members shall be persons who are
1500 qualified electors of the district and who were elected by the
Page 60 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1501 qualified electors, and three governing board members shall be
1502 persons who were elected by the landowners.
1503 (III) Once 28,000 qualified electors reside within the
1504 district, three governing board members shall be persons who are
1505 qualified electors of the district and who were elected by the
1506 qualified electors, and two governing board members shall be
1507 persons who were elected by the landowners.
1508 (IV) Once 35,000 qualified electors reside within the
1509 district, four governing board members shall be persons who are
1510 qualified electors of the district and who were elected by the
1511 qualified electors, and one governing board member shall be a
1512 person who was elected by the landowners.
1513 (V) Once 40,000 qualified electors reside within the
1514 district, all five governing board members shall be persons who
1515 are qualified electors of the district and who were elected by
1516 the qualified electors. Nothing in this sub-subparagraph is
1517 intended to require an election before the expiration of an
1518 existing board member's term.
1519 b. On or before June 1 of each election year, the board
1520 shall determine the number of qualified electors in the district
1521 as of the immediately preceding April 15. The board shall use
1522 and rely upon the official records maintained by the supervisor
1523 of elections and property appraiser or tax collector in
1524 Hillsborough County in making this determination. Such
1525 determination shall be made at a properly noticed meeting of the
Page 61 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1526 board and shall become a part of the official minutes of the
1527 district.
1528 c. All governing board members elected by qualified
1529 electors shall be elected at large at an election occurring as
1530 provided in subsection (2) and this subsection.
1531 d. All governing board members elected by qualified
1532 electors shall reside in the district.
1533 e. Once the district qualifies to have any of its board
1534 members elected by the qualified electors of the district, the
1535 initial and all subsequent elections by the qualified electors
1536 of the district shall be held at the general election in
1537 November. The board shall adopt a resolution, if necessary, to
1538 implement this requirement. The transition process described
1539 herein is intended to be in lieu of the process set forth in s.
1540 189.041, Florida Statutes.
1541 (b) Elections of board members by qualified electors held
1542 pursuant to this subsection shall be nonpartisan and shall be
1543 conducted in the manner prescribed by general law for holding
1544 general elections. Board members shall assume the office on the
1545 second Tuesday following their election.
1546 (c) Candidates seeking election to office by qualified
1547 electors under this subsection shall conduct their campaigns in
1548 accordance with chapter 106, Florida Statutes, and shall file
1549 qualifying papers and qualify for individual seats in accordance
1550 with s. 99.061, Florida Statutes.
Page 62 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1551 (d) The supervisor of elections shall appoint the
1552 inspectors and clerks of elections, prepare and furnish the
1553 ballots, designate polling places, and canvass the returns of
1554 the election of board members by qualified electors. The county
1555 canvassing board shall declare and certify the results of the
1556 election.
1557 (4) Members of the board, regardless of how elected,
1558 shall be public officers, shall be known as supervisors, and,
1559 upon entering into office, shall take and subscribe to the oath
1560 of office as prescribed by s. 876.05, Florida Statutes. Members
1561 of the board shall be subject to ethics and conflict of interest
1562 laws of the state that apply to all local public officers. They
1563 shall hold office for the terms for which they were elected or
1564 appointed and until their successors are chosen and qualified.
1565 If, during the term of office, a vacancy occurs, the remaining
1566 members of the board shall fill each vacancy by an appointment
1567 for the remainder of the unexpired term.
1568 (5) Any elected member of the board of supervisors may be
1569 removed by the Governor for malfeasance, misfeasance,
1570 dishonesty, incompetency, or failure to perform the duties
1571 imposed upon him or her by this act, and any vacancies that may
1572 occur in such office for such reasons shall be filled by the
1573 Governor as soon as practicable.
1574 (6) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a
1575 quorum for the purposes of conducting its business and
Page 63 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1576 exercising its powers and for all other purposes. Action taken
1577 by the district shall be upon a vote of a majority of the
1578 members present unless general law or a rule of the district
1579 requires a greater number.
1580 (7) As soon as practicable after each election or
1581 appointment, the board shall organize by electing one of its
1582 members as chair and by electing a secretary, who need not be a
1583 member of the board, and such other officers as the board may
1584 deem necessary.
1585 (8) The board shall keep a permanent record book entitled
1586 "Record of Proceedings of Land Reserve Stewardship District," in
1587 which shall be recorded minutes of all meetings, resolutions,
1588 proceedings, certificates, bonds given by all employees, and any
1589 and all corporate acts. The record book and all other district
1590 records shall at reasonable times be opened to inspection in the
1591 same manner as state, county, and municipal records pursuant to
1592 chapter 119, Florida Statutes. The record book shall be kept at
1593 the office or other regular place of business maintained by the
1594 board in a designated location in Hillsborough County.
1595 (9) Each supervisor may not be entitled to receive
1596 compensation for his or her services in excess of the limits
1597 established in s. 190.006(8), Florida Statutes, or any other
1598 provision of general law; however, each supervisor shall receive
1599 travel and per diem expenses as set forth in s. 112.061, Florida
1600 Statutes.
Page 64 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1601 (10) All meetings of the board shall be open to the public
1602 and governed by chapter 286, Florida Statutes.
1603 Section 6. Board of supervisors; general duties.—
1604 (1) DISTRICT MANAGER AND EMPLOYEES.—The board shall
1605 employ and fix the compensation of a district manager, who shall
1606 have charge and supervision of the works of the district and
1607 shall be responsible for preserving and maintaining any
1608 improvement or facility constructed or erected pursuant to this
1609 act, for maintaining and operating the equipment owned by the
1610 district, and for performing such other duties as may be
1611 prescribed by the board. It is not a conflict of interest or an
1612 abuse of public position under chapter 112, Florida Statutes,
1613 for a board member, the district manager, or another employee of
1614 the district to be a stockholder, officer, or employee of a
1615 landowner or an entity affiliated with a landowner. The district
1616 manager may hire or otherwise employ and terminate the
1617 employment of such other persons, including, without limitation,
1618 professional, supervisory, and clerical employees, as may be
1619 necessary and authorized by the board. The compensation and
1620 other conditions of employment of the officers and employees of
1621 the district shall be as provided by the board.
1622 (2) TREASURER.—The board shall designate a person who is
1623 a resident of the state as treasurer of the district, who shall
1624 have charge of the funds of the district. Such funds shall be
1625 disbursed only upon the order of or pursuant to a resolution of
Page 65 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1626 the board by warrant or check countersigned by the treasurer and
1627 by such other person as may be authorized by the board. The
1628 board may give the treasurer such other or additional powers and
1629 duties as the board may deem appropriate and may fix his or her
1630 compensation. The board may require the treasurer to give a bond
1631 in such amount, on such terms, and with such sureties as may be
1632 deemed satisfactory to the board to secure the performance by
1633 the treasurer of his or her powers and duties. The financial
1634 records of the board shall be audited by an independent
1635 certified public accountant in accordance with the requirements
1636 of general law.
1637 (3) PUBLIC DEPOSITORY.—The board is authorized to select
1638 as a depository for its funds any qualified public depository as
1639 defined in s. 280.02, Florida Statutes, which meets all the
1640 requirements of chapter 280, Florida Statutes, and has been
1641 designated by the treasurer as a qualified public depository
1642 upon such terms and conditions as to the payment of interest by
1643 such depository upon the funds so deposited as the board may
1644 deem just and reasonable.
1645 (4) BUDGET; REPORTS AND REVIEWS.—
1646 (a) The district shall provide financial reports in such
1647 form and such manner as prescribed pursuant to this act and
1648 chapter 218, Florida Statutes.
1649 (b) On or before July 15 of each year, the district
1650 manager shall prepare a proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal
Page 66 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1651 year to be submitted to the board for board approval. The
1652 proposed budget shall include at the direction of the board an
1653 estimate of all necessary expenditures of the district for the
1654 ensuing fiscal year and an estimate of income to the district
1655 from the taxes and assessments provided in this act. The board
1656 shall consider the proposed budget item by item and may either
1657 approve the budget as proposed by the district manager or modify
1658 the same in part or in whole. The board shall indicate its
1659 approval of the budget by resolution, which resolution shall
1660 provide for a hearing on the budget as approved. Notice of the
1661 hearing on the budget shall be published in a newspaper of
1662 general circulation in the general area of the district once a
1663 week for 2 consecutive weeks, except that the first publication
1664 shall be no less than 15 days before the date of the hearing.
1665 The notice shall further contain a designation of the day, time,
1666 and place of the public hearing. At the day, time, and place
1667 designated in the notice, the board shall hear all objections to
1668 the budget as proposed and may make such changes as the board
1669 deems necessary. At the conclusion of the budget hearing, the
1670 board shall, by resolution, adopt the budget as finally approved
1671 by the board. The budget shall be adopted before October 1 of
1672 each year.
1673 (c) At least 60 days before adoption, the board of
1674 supervisors of the district shall submit to the Board of County
1675 Commissioners of Hillsborough County, for purposes of disclosure
Page 67 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1676 and information only, the proposed annual budget for the ensuing
1677 fiscal year, and the board of county commissioners may submit
1678 written comments to the board of supervisors solely for the
1679 assistance and information of the board of supervisors in
1680 adopting its annual district budget.
1681 (d) The board of supervisors shall submit annually a
1682 public facilities report to the Board of County Commissioners of
1683 Hillsborough County pursuant to s. 189.08, Florida Statutes. The
1684 board of county commissioners may use and rely on the district's
1685 public facilities report in the preparation or revision of the
1686 Hillsborough County comprehensive plan.
1687 (5) DISCLOSURE OF PUBLIC INFORMATION; WEB-BASED PUBLIC
1688 ACCESS.—The district shall take affirmative steps to provide for
1689 the full disclosure of information relating to the public
1690 financing and maintenance of improvements to real property
1691 undertaken by the district. Such information shall be made
1692 available to all existing and prospective residents of the
1693 district. The district shall furnish each developer of a
1694 residential development within the district with sufficient
1695 copies of that information to provide each prospective initial
1696 purchaser of property in that development with a copy; and any
1697 developer of a residential development within the district, when
1698 required by general law to provide a public offering statement,
1699 shall include a copy of such information relating to the public
1700 financing and maintenance of improvements in the public offering
Page 68 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1701 statement. The district shall file the disclosure documents
1702 required by this subsection and any amendments thereto in the
1703 property records of each county in which the district is
1704 located. By the end of the first full fiscal year of the
1705 district's creation, the district shall maintain an official
1706 Internet website in accordance with s. 189.069, Florida
1707 Statutes.
1708 (6) GENERAL POWERS.—The district shall have, and the
1709 board may exercise, the following general powers:
1710 (a) To sue and be sued in the name of the district; to
1711 adopt and use a seal and authorize the use of a facsimile
1712 thereof; to acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, or otherwise,
1713 and to dispose of, real and personal property, or any estate
1714 therein; and to make and execute contracts and other instruments
1715 necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers.
1716 (b) To apply for coverage of its employees under the
1717 Florida Retirement System in the same manner as if such
1718 employees were state employees.
1719 (c) To contract for the services of consultants to
1720 perform planning, engineering, legal, or other appropriate
1721 services of a professional nature. Such contracts shall be
1722 subject to public bidding or competitive negotiation
1723 requirements as set forth in general law applicable to
1724 independent special districts.
1725 (d) To borrow money and accept gifts; to apply for and
Page 69 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1726 use grants or loans of money or other property from the United
1727 States, the state, a unit of local government, or any person for
1728 any district purposes and enter into agreements required in
1729 connection therewith; and to hold, use, and dispose of such
1730 moneys or property for any district purposes in accordance with
1731 the terms of the gift, grant, loan, or agreement relating
1732 thereto.
1733 (e) To adopt and enforce rules and orders pursuant to
1734 chapter 120, Florida Statutes, prescribing the powers, duties,
1735 and functions of the officers of the district; the conduct of
1736 the business of the district; the maintenance of the records of
1737 the district; and the form of certificates evidencing tax liens
1738 of the district and all other documents and records of the
1739 district. The board may also adopt and enforce administrative
1740 rules with respect to any of the projects of the district and
1741 define the area to be included therein. The board may also adopt
1742 resolutions which may be necessary for the conduct of district
1743 business.
1744 (f) To maintain an office at such place or places as the
1745 board of supervisors designates in Hillsborough County and
1746 within the district when facilities are available.
1747 (g) To hold, control, and acquire by donation, purchase,
1748 or condemnation, or dispose of, any public easements,
1749 dedications to public use, platted reservations for public
1750 purposes, or any reservations for those purposes authorized by
Page 70 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1751 this act and to make use of such easements, dedications, or
1752 reservations for the purposes authorized by this act.
1753 (h) To lease as lessor or lessee to or from any person,
1754 firm, corporation, association, or body, public or private, any
1755 projects of the type that the district is authorized to
1756 undertake and facilities or property of any nature for the use
1757 of the district to carry out the purposes authorized by this
1758 act.
1759 (i) To borrow money and issue bonds, certificates,
1760 warrants, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness as provided
1761 herein; to levy such taxes and assessments as may be authorized;
1762 and to charge, collect, and enforce fees and other user charges.
1763 (j) To raise, by user charges or fees authorized by
1764 resolution of the board, amounts of money which are necessary
1765 for the conduct of district activities and services and to
1766 enforce their receipt and collection in the manner prescribed by
1767 resolution not inconsistent with general law.
1768 (k) To exercise all powers of eminent domain now or
1769 hereafter conferred on counties in this state; provided,
1770 however, that such power of eminent domain may not be exercised
1771 outside the territorial limits of the district unless the
1772 district receives prior approval by vote of a resolution of the
1773 governing body of the county if the taking will occur in an
1774 unincorporated area in that county, or the governing body of the
1775 city if the taking will occur in an incorporated area. The
Page 71 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1776 district does not have the power to exercise eminent domain over
1777 municipal, county, state, or federal property. The powers
1778 hereinabove granted to the district shall be so construed to
1779 enable the district to fulfill the objects and purposes of the
1780 district as set forth in this act.
1781 (l) To cooperate with, or contract with, other
1782 governmental agencies as may be necessary, convenient,
1783 incidental, or proper in connection with any of the powers,
1784 duties, or purposes authorized by this act.
1785 (m) To assess and to impose upon lands in the district ad
1786 valorem taxes as provided by this act.
1787 (n) If and when authorized by general law, to determine,
1788 order, levy, impose, collect, and enforce maintenance taxes.
1789 (o) To determine, order, levy, impose, collect, and
1790 enforce assessments pursuant to this act and chapter 170,
1791 Florida Statutes, pursuant to authority granted in s. 197.3631,
1792 Florida Statutes, or pursuant to other provisions of general law
1793 now or hereinafter enacted which provide or authorize a
1794 supplemental means to order, levy, impose, or collect special
1795 assessments. Such special assessments, at the discretion of the
1796 district, may be collected and enforced pursuant to ss. 197.3632
1797 and 197.3635, Florida Statutes, and chapters 170 and 173,
1798 Florida Statutes, as they may be amended from time to time, or
1799 as provided by this act, or by other means authorized by general
1800 law now or hereinafter enacted. The district may levy such
Page 72 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1801 special assessments for the purposes provided in this act and to
1802 pay special assessments imposed by Hillsborough County on lands
1803 within the district.
1804 (p) To exercise such special powers and other express
1805 powers as may be authorized and granted by this act in the
1806 charter of the district, including powers as provided in any
1807 interlocal agreement entered into pursuant to chapter 163,
1808 Florida Statutes, or which shall be required or permitted to be
1809 undertaken by the district pursuant to any development order,
1810 including any detailed specific area plan development order, or
1811 any interlocal service agreement with Hillsborough County for
1812 fair-share capital construction funding for any certain capital
1813 facilities or systems required of a developer pursuant to any
1814 applicable development order or agreement.
1815 (q) To exercise all of the powers necessary, convenient,
1816 incidental, or proper in connection with any other powers or
1817 duties or the special and limited purpose of the district
1818 authorized by this act.
1819
1820 This subsection shall be construed liberally in order to
1821 effectively carry out the special and limited purpose of this
1822 act.
1823 (7) SPECIAL POWERS.—The district shall have, and the
1824 board may exercise, the following special powers to implement
1825 its lawful and special purpose and to provide, pursuant to that
Page 73 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1826 purpose, systems, facilities, services, improvements, projects,
1827 works, and infrastructure, each of which constitutes a lawful
1828 public purpose when exercised pursuant to this charter, subject
1829 to, and not inconsistent with, general law regarding utility
1830 providers' territorial and service agreements; the regulatory
1831 jurisdiction and permitting authority of all other applicable
1832 governmental bodies, agencies, and any special districts having
1833 authority with respect to any area included therein; and to
1834 plan, establish, acquire, construct or reconstruct, enlarge or
1835 extend, equip, operate, finance, fund, and maintain
1836 improvements, systems, facilities, services, works, projects,
1837 and infrastructure within or without the boundaries of the
1838 district. Any or all of the following special powers are granted
1839 by this act in order to implement the special and limited
1840 purpose of the district but do not constitute obligations to
1841 undertake such improvements, systems, facilities, services,
1842 works, projects, or infrastructure:
1843 (a) To provide water management and control for the lands
1844 within the district, including irrigation systems and
1845 facilities, and to connect some or any of such facilities with
1846 roads and bridges. In the event that the board assumes the
1847 responsibility for providing water management and control for
1848 the district which is to be financed by benefit special
1849 assessments, the board shall adopt plans and assessments
1850 pursuant to general law or may proceed to adopt water management
Page 74 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1851 and control plans, assess for benefits, and apportion and levy
1852 special assessments as follows:
1853 1. The board shall cause to be made by the district's
1854 engineer, or such other engineer or engineers as the board may
1855 employ for that purpose, complete and comprehensive water
1856 management and control plans for the lands located within the
1857 district that will be improved in any part or in whole by any
1858 system of facilities that may be outlined and adopted, and the
1859 engineer shall make a report in writing to the board with maps
1860 and profiles of said surveys and an estimate of the cost of
1861 carrying out and completing the plans.
1862 2. Upon the completion of such plans, the board shall
1863 hold a hearing thereon to hear objections thereto, shall give
1864 notice of the time and place fixed for such hearing by
1865 publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the general
1866 area of the district once a week for 2 consecutive weeks, and
1867 shall permit the inspection of the plan at the office of the
1868 district by all persons interested. All objections to the plan
1869 shall be filed at or before the time fixed in the notice for the
1870 hearing and shall be in writing.
1871 3. After the hearing, the board shall consider the
1872 proposed plan and any objections thereto and may modify, reject,
1873 or adopt the plan or continue the hearing until a day certain
1874 for further consideration of the proposed plan or modifications
1875 thereof.
Page 75 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1876 4. When the board approves a plan, a resolution shall be
1877 adopted and a certified copy thereof shall be filed in the
1878 office of the secretary and incorporated by him or her into the
1879 records of the district.
1880 5. The water management and control plan may be altered
1881 in detail from time to time until the engineer's report pursuant
1882 to s. 298.301, Florida Statutes, is filed, but not in such
1883 manner as to materially affect the conditions of its adoption.
1884 After the engineer's report has been filed, the plan may not be
1885 altered except as provided by this act.
1886 6. Within 20 days after the final adoption of the plan by
1887 the board, the board shall proceed pursuant to s. 298.301,
1888 Florida Statutes.
1889 (b) To provide water supply, sewer, wastewater, and
1890 reclaimed water management, reclamation, and reuse, or any
1891 combination thereof, and any irrigation systems, facilities, and
1892 services and to construct and operate water systems, sewer
1893 systems, irrigation systems, and reclaimed water systems such as
1894 connecting intercepting or outlet sewers and sewer mains and
1895 pipes and water mains, conduits, or pipelines in, along, and
1896 under any street, alley, highway, or other public place or way,
1897 and to dispose of any water, effluent, residue, or other
1898 byproduct of such water system, sewer system, irrigation system,
1899 or reclaimed water system and to enter into interlocal
1900 agreements and other agreements with public or private entities
Page 76 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1901 for the same.
1902 (c) To provide any necessary bridges, culverts, wildlife
1903 corridors, or road crossings across any drain, ditch, canal,
1904 floodway, holding basin, excavation, public highway, tract,
1905 grade, fill, or cut and roadways over levees and embankments,
1906 and to construct any and all of such works and improvements
1907 across, through, or over any public right-of way, highway,
1908 grade, fill, or cut.
1909 (d) To provide district roads or other roads equal to or
1910 exceeding the specifications of the county in which such
1911 district roads or other roads are located, and to provide street
1912 lighting. This special power includes, but is not limited to,
1913 roads, parkways, intersections, bridges, landscaping,
1914 hardscaping, irrigation, bicycle lanes, sidewalks, jogging
1915 paths, multiuse pathways and trails, street lighting, traffic
1916 signals, regulatory or informational signage, road striping,
1917 underground conduit, underground cable or fiber or wire
1918 installed pursuant to an agreement with or tariff of a retail
1919 provider of services, and all other customary elements of a
1920 functioning modern road system in general or as tied to the
1921 conditions of development approval for the area within and
1922 without the district, and parking facilities that are
1923 freestanding or that may be related to any innovative strategic
1924 intermodal system of transportation pursuant to applicable
1925 federal, state, and local laws and ordinances.
Page 77 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1926 (e) To provide buses, trolleys, rail access, mass transit
1927 facilities, transit shelters, ridesharing facilities and
1928 services, parking improvements, and related signage.
1929 (f) To provide investigation and remediation costs
1930 associated with the cleanup of actual or perceived environmental
1931 contamination within the district under the supervision or
1932 direction of a competent governmental authority unless the
1933 covered costs benefit any person who is a landowner within the
1934 district and who caused or contributed to the contamination.
1935 (g) To provide observation, mitigation, wetland creation,
1936 and wildlife habitat areas, including the maintenance of any
1937 plant or animal species, and any related interest in real or
1938 personal property.
1939 (h) Using its general and special powers as set forth in
1940 this act, to provide any other project within or without the
1941 boundaries of the district when the project is the subject of an
1942 agreement between the district and the Board of County
1943 Commissioners of Hillsborough County or with any other
1944 applicable public, governmental, or private entity and is not
1945 inconsistent with the effective local comprehensive plans.
1946 (i) To provide parks and facilities for indoor and
1947 outdoor recreational, cultural, and educational uses.
1948 (j) To provide school buildings and related structures,
1949 which may be leased, sold, or donated to the school district,
1950 for use in the educational system when authorized by the
Page 78 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1951 district school board.
1952 (k) To provide security, including electronic intrusion-
1953 detection systems and patrol cars, when authorized by proper
1954 governmental agencies, and to contract with the appropriate
1955 local general-purpose government agencies for an increased level
1956 of such services within the district boundaries.
1957 (l) To provide control and elimination of mosquitoes and
1958 other arthropods of public health importance.
1959 (m) To enter into impact fee, mobility fee, or other
1960 similar credit agreements with Hillsborough County or other
1961 governmental bodies or a landowner developer and to sell or
1962 assign such credits on such terms as the district deems
1963 appropriate.
1964 (n) To provide buildings and structures for district
1965 offices, maintenance facilities, meeting facilities, town
1966 centers, or any other projects authorized or granted by this
1967 act.
1968 (o) To establish and create, at noticed meetings, such
1969 departments of the board of supervisors of the district, as well
1970 as committees, task forces, boards, or commissions, or other
1971 agencies under the supervision and control of the district, as
1972 from time to time the members of the board may deem necessary or
1973 desirable in the performance of the acts or other things
1974 necessary to exercise the board's general or special powers to
1975 implement an innovative project to carry out the special and
Page 79 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
1976 limited purpose of the district as provided in this act and to
1977 delegate the exercise of its powers to such departments, boards,
1978 task forces, committees, or other agencies, and such
1979 administrative duties and other powers as the board may deem
1980 necessary or desirable, but only if there is a set of expressed
1981 limitations for accountability, notice, and periodic written
1982 reporting to the board that shall retain the powers of the
1983 board.
1984 (p) To adopt rules necessary for the district to enforce
1985 certain deed restrictions pertaining to the use and operation of
1986 real property within the district. For the purpose of this
1987 paragraph, the term "deed restrictions" means those covenants,
1988 conditions, restrictions, compliance mechanisms, and enforcement
1989 remedies contained in any applicable declarations of covenants
1990 and restrictions that govern the use and operation of real
1991 property and for which covenants, conditions, and restrictions
1992 there is no homeowners' association or property owner's
1993 association having respective enforcement powers unless, with
1994 respect to a homeowners' association whose board is under member
1995 control, the association and the district agree in writing to
1996 enforcement by the district. The district may adopt by rule all
1997 or certain portions of the deed restrictions that:
1998 1. Relate to limitations, prohibitions, compliance
1999 mechanisms, or enforcement remedies that apply only to external
2000 appearances or uses and are deemed by the district to be
Page 80 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2001 generally beneficial for the district's landowners and for which
2002 enforcement by the district is appropriate, as determined by the
2003 district's board of supervisors; or
2004 2. Are consistent with the requirements of a development
2005 order or regulatory agency permit.
2006 (q) To provide electrical, sustainable, or green
2007 infrastructure improvements, facilities, and services,
2008 including, but not limited to, recycling of natural resources,
2009 reduction of energy demands, development and generation of
2010 alternative or renewable energy sources and technologies,
2011 mitigation of urban heat islands, sequestration, capping or
2012 trading of carbon emissions or carbon emissions credits, LEED or
2013 Florida Green Building Coalition certification, and development
2014 of facilities and improvements for low-impact development; to
2015 enter into joint ventures, public-private partnerships, and
2016 other agreements; and to grant such easements as may be
2017 necessary to accomplish the foregoing. Nothing herein shall
2018 authorize the district to provide electric service to retail
2019 customers or otherwise act to impair electric utility franchise
2020 agreements.
2021 (r) To provide for any facilities or improvements that
2022 may otherwise be provided for by any county or municipality,
2023 including, but not limited to, libraries, annexes, substations,
2024 and other buildings to house public officials, staff, and
2025 employees.
Page 81 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2026 (s) To provide waste collection and disposal.
2027 (t) To provide for the construction and operation of
2028 communications systems and related infrastructure for the
2029 carriage and distribution of communications services; to enter
2030 into joint ventures, public-private partnerships, and other
2031 agreements; and to grant such easements as may be necessary to
2032 accomplish the foregoing. For purposes of this paragraph, the
2033 term "communications systems" means all facilities, buildings,
2034 equipment, items, and methods necessary or desirable in order to
2035 provide communications services, including, without limitation,
2036 wires, cables, conduits, wireless cell sites, computers, modems,
2037 satellite antennae sites, transmission facilities, network
2038 facilities, and appurtenant devices necessary and appropriate to
2039 support the provision of communications services. The term
2040 "communications services" includes, without limitation,
2041 Internet, voice telephone, or similar services provided by
2042 voice-over-Internet protocol, cable television, data
2043 transmission services, electronic security monitoring services,
2044 and multi-channel video programming distribution services.
2045 Nothing herein shall authorize the district to provide
2046 communications services to retail customers or otherwise act to
2047 impair existing service provider franchise agreements. However,
2048 the district may contract with such providers for resale
2049 purposes.
2050 (u) To provide health care facilities and to enter into
Page 82 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2051 public-private partnerships and agreements as may be necessary
2052 to accomplish the foregoing.
2053 (v) To coordinate, work with, and, as the board deems
2054 appropriate, enter into interlocal agreements with any public or
2055 private entity for the provision of an institution or
2056 institutions of higher education.
2057 (w) To coordinate, work with, and, as the board deems
2058 appropriate, enter into public-private partnerships and
2059 agreements as may be necessary or useful to effectuate the
2060 purposes of this act.
2061
2062 The special powers provided in this act may not be deemed
2063 exclusive or restrictive but shall be deemed to incorporate all
2064 powers express or implied necessary or incident to carrying out
2065 such special powers, including the general powers provided by
2066 this act to the district to implement its purposes. This
2067 subsection shall be construed liberally in order to effectively
2068 carry out the special and limited purpose of the district under
2069 this act.
2070 (8) ISSUANCE OF BOND ANTICIPATION NOTES.—In addition to
2071 the other powers provided for in this act, and not in limitation
2072 thereof, the district shall have the power, at any time and from
2073 time to time after the issuance of any bonds of the district are
2074 authorized, to borrow money for the purposes for which such
2075 bonds are to be issued in anticipation of the receipt of the
Page 83 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2076 proceeds of the sale of such bonds and to issue bond
2077 anticipation notes in a principal sum not in excess of the
2078 authorized maximum amount of such bond issue. Such notes shall
2079 be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such
2080 rate, not to exceed the maximum rate allowed by general law,
2081 mature at such time or times not later than 5 years after the
2082 date of issuance, and be in such form and executed in such
2083 manner as the board shall prescribe. Such notes may be sold at
2084 either public or private sale or, if such notes shall be renewal
2085 notes, may be exchanged for notes then outstanding on such terms
2086 as the board shall determine. Such notes shall be paid from the
2087 proceeds of such bonds when issued. The board may, in its
2088 discretion, in lieu of retiring the notes by means of bonds,
2089 retire them by means of current revenues or from any taxes or
2090 assessments levied for the payment of such bonds, but, in such
2091 event, a like amount of the bonds authorized may not be issued.
2092 (9) BORROWING.—The district at any time may obtain loans,
2093 in such amount and on such terms and conditions as the board may
2094 approve, for the purpose of paying any of the expenses of the
2095 district or any costs incurred or that may be incurred in
2096 connection with any of the projects of the district, which loans
2097 shall bear such interest as the board determines, not to exceed
2098 the maximum rate allowed by general law, and may be payable from
2099 and secured by a pledge of such funds, revenues, taxes, and
2100 assessments as the board may determine; provided, however, that
Page 84 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2101 the provisions contained in any proceeding under which bonds
2102 were theretofore issued and are then outstanding. For the
2103 purpose of defraying such costs and expenses, the district may
2104 issue negotiable notes, warrants, or other evidences of debt to
2105 be payable at such time or times and to bear such interest as
2106 the board may determine, not to exceed the maximum rate allowed
2107 by general law, and to be sold or discounted at such price or
2108 prices not less than 95 percent of par value and on such terms
2109 as the board may deem advisable. The board shall have the right
2110 to provide for the payment thereof by pledging the whole or any
2111 part of the funds, revenues, taxes, and assessments of the
2112 district or by covenanting to budget and appropriate from such
2113 funds. The approval of the electors residing in the district is
2114 only necessary when required by the State Constitution.
2115 (10) BONDS.—
2116 (a) Sale of bonds.—Bonds may be sold in blocks or
2117 installments at different times, or an entire issue or series
2118 may be sold at one time. Bonds may be sold at public or private
2119 sale after such advertisement, if any, as the board may deem
2120 advisable, but not in any event at less than 90 percent of the
2121 par value thereof, together with accrued interest thereon. Bonds
2122 may be sold or exchanged for refunding bonds. Special assessment
2123 and revenue bonds may be delivered by the district as payment of
2124 the purchase price of any project or part thereof, or a
2125 combination of projects or parts thereof, or as the purchase
Page 85 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2126 price or exchange for any property, real, personal, or mixed,
2127 including franchises or services rendered by any contractor,
2128 engineer, or other person, all at one time or in blocks from
2129 time to time, in such manner and upon such terms as the board at
2130 its discretion shall determine. The price or prices for any
2131 bonds sold, exchanged, or delivered may be:
2132 1. The money paid for the bonds.
2133 2. The principal amount, plus accrued interest to the
2134 date of redemption or exchange, or outstanding obligations
2135 exchanged for refunding bonds.
2136 3. In the case of special assessment or revenue bonds,
2137 the amount of any indebtedness to contractors or other persons
2138 paid with such bonds, or the fair value of any properties
2139 exchanged for the bonds, as determined by the board.
2140 (b) Authorization and form of bonds.—Any general
2141 obligation bonds, special assessment bonds, or revenue bonds may
2142 be authorized by resolution or resolutions of the board which
2143 shall be adopted by a majority of all the members thereof then
2144 in office. Such resolution or resolutions may be adopted at the
2145 same meeting at which they are introduced and need not be
2146 published or posted. The board may, by resolution, authorize the
2147 issuance of bonds and fix the aggregate amount of bonds to be
2148 issued; the purpose or purposes for which the moneys derived
2149 therefrom shall be expended, including, but not limited to,
2150 payment of costs as defined in section 2; the rate or rates of
Page 86 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2151 interest, not to exceed the maximum rate allowed by general law;
2152 the denomination of the bonds; whether the bonds are to be
2153 issued in one or multiple series; the date or dates of maturity,
2154 which may not exceed 40 years after their respective dates of
2155 issuance; the medium of payment; the place or places within or
2156 without the state at which payment shall be made; registration
2157 privileges; redemption terms and privileges, whether with or
2158 without premium; the manner of execution; the form of the bonds,
2159 including any interest coupons to be attached thereto; the
2160 manner of execution of bonds and coupons; and any and all other
2161 terms, covenants, and conditions thereof and the establishment
2162 of revenue or other funds. Such authorizing resolution or
2163 resolutions may further provide for the contracts authorized by
2164 s. 159.825(1)(f) and (g), Florida Statutes, regardless of the
2165 tax treatment of such bonds being authorized, subject to the
2166 finding by the board of a net saving to the district resulting
2167 by reason thereof. Such authorizing resolution may further
2168 provide that such bonds may be executed in accordance with the
2169 Registered Public Obligations Act, except that bonds not issued
2170 in registered form shall be valid if manually countersigned by
2171 an officer designated by appropriate resolution of the board.
2172 The seal of the district may be affixed, lithographed, engraved,
2173 or otherwise reproduced in facsimile on such bonds. In case any
2174 officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons
2175 shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such
Page 87 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2176 bonds, such signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid
2177 and sufficient for all purposes as if he or she had remained in
2178 office until such delivery.
2179 (c) Interim certificates; replacement certificates.—
2180 Pending the preparation of definitive bonds, the board may issue
2181 interim certificates or receipts or temporary bonds, in such
2182 form and with such provisions as the board may determine,
2183 exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds have been
2184 executed and are available for delivery. The board may also
2185 provide for the replacement of any bonds which become mutilated,
2186 lost, or destroyed.
2187 (d) Negotiability of bonds.—Any bond issued under this
2188 act or any temporary bond, in the absence of an express recital
2189 on the face thereof that it is nonnegotiable, shall be fully
2190 negotiable and shall be and constitute a negotiable instrument
2191 within the meaning and for all purposes of the law merchant and
2192 general law.
2193 (e) Defeasance.—The board may make such provision with
2194 respect to the defeasance of the right, title, and interest of
2195 the holders of any of the bonds and obligations of the district
2196 in any revenues, funds, or other properties by which such bonds
2197 are secured as the board deems appropriate and, without
2198 limitation on the foregoing, may provide that when such bonds or
2199 obligations become due and payable or shall have been called for
2200 redemption and the whole amount of the principal and interest
Page 88 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2201 and premium, if any, due and payable upon the bonds or
2202 obligations then outstanding shall be held in trust for such
2203 purpose, and provision shall also be made for paying all other
2204 sums payable in connection with such bonds or other obligations,
2205 and in such event the right, title, and interest of the holders
2206 of the bonds in any revenues, funds, or other properties by
2207 which such bonds are secured shall thereupon cease, terminate,
2208 and become void; and the board may apply any surplus in any
2209 sinking fund established in connection with such bonds or
2210 obligations and all balances remaining in all other funds or
2211 accounts other than moneys held for the redemption or payment of
2212 the bonds or other obligations to any lawful purpose of the
2213 district as the board shall determine.
2214 (f) Issuance of additional bonds.—If the proceeds of any
2215 bonds are less than the cost of completing the project in
2216 connection with which such bonds were issued, the board may
2217 authorize the issuance of additional bonds, upon such terms and
2218 conditions as the board may provide in the resolution
2219 authorizing the issuance thereof, but only in compliance with
2220 the resolution or other proceedings authorizing the issuance of
2221 the original bonds.
2222 (g) Refunding bonds.—The district is authorized to issue
2223 bonds to provide for the retirement or refunding of any bonds or
2224 obligations of the district that at the time of such issuance
2225 are or subsequent thereto become due and payable, or that at the
Page 89 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2226 time of issuance have been called or are, or will be, subject to
2227 call for redemption within 10 years thereafter, or the surrender
2228 of which can be procured from the holders thereof at prices
2229 satisfactory to the board. Refunding bonds may be issued at any
2230 time that in the judgment of the board such issuance will be
2231 advantageous to the district. Approval of the qualified electors
2232 residing in the district is not required for the issuance of
2233 refunding bonds except in cases in which such approval is
2234 required by the State Constitution. The board may by resolution
2235 confer upon the holders of such refunding bonds all rights,
2236 powers, and remedies to which the holders would be entitled if
2237 they continued to be the owners and had possession of the bonds
2238 for the refinancing of which such refunding bonds are issued,
2239 including, but not limited to, the preservation of the lien of
2240 such bonds on the revenues of any project or on pledged funds,
2241 without extinguishment, impairment, or diminution thereof. The
2242 provisions of this act relating to bonds of the district shall,
2243 unless the context otherwise requires, govern the issuance of
2244 refunding bonds, the form and other details thereof, the rights
2245 of the holders thereof, and the duties of the board with respect
2246 to such bonds.
2247 (h) Revenue bonds.—
2248 1. The district shall have the power to issue revenue
2249 bonds from time to time without limitation as to amount. Such
2250 revenue bonds may be secured by, or payable from, the gross or
Page 90 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2251 net pledge of the revenues to be derived from any project or
2252 combination of projects; from the rates, fees, or other charges
2253 to be collected from the users of any project or projects; from
2254 any revenue-producing undertaking or activity of the district;
2255 from special assessments; from benefit special assessments; or
2256 from any other source or pledged security. Such bonds do not
2257 constitute an indebtedness of the district and the approval of
2258 the qualified electors is not required unless such bonds are
2259 additionally secured by the full faith and credit and taxing
2260 power of the district.
2261 2. Any two or more projects may be combined and
2262 consolidated into a single project and may hereafter be operated
2263 and maintained as a single project. The revenue bonds authorized
2264 herein may be issued to finance any one or more of such
2265 projects, regardless of whether such projects have been combined
2266 and consolidated into a single project. If the board deems it
2267 advisable, the proceedings authorizing such revenue bonds may
2268 provide that the district may thereafter combine the projects
2269 then being financed or theretofore financed with other projects
2270 to be subsequently financed by the district and that revenue
2271 bonds to be thereafter issued by the district shall be on parity
2272 with the revenue bonds then being issued, all on such terms,
2273 conditions, and limitations as shall have been provided in the
2274 proceeding which authorized the original bonds.
2275 (i) General obligation bonds.—
Page 91 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2276 1. Subject to the limitations of this charter, the
2277 district shall have the power to issue general obligation bonds
2278 to finance or refinance capital projects or to refund
2279 outstanding bonds in an aggregate principal amount of bonds
2280 outstanding at any one time not in excess of 75 percent of the
2281 assessed value of the taxable property within the district as
2282 shown on the pertinent tax records at the time of the
2283 authorization of the general obligation bonds for which the full
2284 faith and credit of the district is pledged. Except for
2285 refunding bonds, general obligation bonds may not be issued
2286 unless the bonds are issued to finance or refinance a capital
2287 project and the issuance has been approved at an election held
2288 in accordance with the requirements for such election as
2289 prescribed by the State Constitution. Such elections shall be
2290 called to be held in the district by the Board of County
2291 Commissioners of Hillsborough County upon the request of the
2292 board of the district. The expenses of calling and holding an
2293 election shall be at the expense of the district, and the
2294 district shall reimburse the county for any expenses incurred in
2295 calling or holding such election.
2296 2. The district may pledge its full faith and credit for
2297 the payment of the principal and interest on such general
2298 obligation bonds and for any reserve funds provided therefor and
2299 may unconditionally and irrevocably pledge itself to levy ad
2300 valorem taxes on all taxable property in the district, to the
Page 92 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2301 extent necessary for the payment thereof, without limitation as
2302 to rate or amount.
2303 3. If the board determines to issue general obligation
2304 bonds for more than one capital project, the approval of the
2305 issuance of the bonds for each and all such projects may be
2306 submitted to the electors on one ballot. The failure of the
2307 electors to approve the issuance of bonds for any one or more
2308 capital projects does not defeat the approval of bonds for any
2309 capital project which has been approved by the electors.
2310 4. In arriving at the amount of general obligation bonds
2311 permitted to be outstanding at any one time pursuant to
2312 subparagraph 1., there may not be included any general
2313 obligation bonds that are additionally secured by the pledge of:
2314 a. Any assessments levied in an amount sufficient to pay
2315 the principal and interest on the general obligation bonds so
2316 additionally secured, which assessments have been equalized and
2317 confirmed by resolution of the board pursuant to this act or s.
2318 170.08, Florida Statutes.
2319 b. Water revenues, sewer revenues, or water and sewer
2320 revenues of the district to be derived from user fees in an
2321 amount sufficient to pay the principal and interest on the
2322 general obligation bonds so additionally secured.
2323 c. Any combination of assessments and revenues described
2324 in sub-subparagraphs a. and b.
2325 (j) Bonds as legal investment or security.—
Page 93 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2326 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
2327 contrary, all bonds issued under this act shall constitute legal
2328 investments for savings banks, banks, trust companies, insurance
2329 companies, executors, administrators, trustees, guardians, and
2330 other fiduciaries and for any board, body, agency,
2331 instrumentality, county, municipality, or other political
2332 subdivision of the state and shall be and constitute security
2333 which may be deposited by banks or trust companies as security
2334 for deposits of state, county, municipal, or other public funds
2335 or by insurance companies as required or voluntary statutory
2336 deposits.
2337 2. Any bonds issued by the district shall be
2338 incontestable in the hands of bona fide purchasers or holders
2339 for value and are not invalid because of any irregularity or
2340 defect in the proceedings for the issue and sale thereof.
2341 (k) Covenants.—Any resolution authorizing the issuance of
2342 bonds may contain such covenants as the board may deem
2343 advisable, and all such covenants shall constitute valid and
2344 legally binding and enforceable contracts between the district
2345 and the bondholders, regardless of the time of issuance thereof.
2346 Such covenants may include, without limitation, covenants
2347 concerning the disposition of the bond proceeds; the use and
2348 disposition of project revenues; the pledging of revenues,
2349 taxes, and assessments; the obligations of the district with
2350 respect to the operation of the project and the maintenance of
Page 94 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2351 adequate project revenues; the issuance of additional bonds; the
2352 appointment, powers, and duties of trustees and receivers; the
2353 acquisition of outstanding bonds and obligations; restrictions
2354 on the establishment of competing projects or facilities;
2355 restrictions on the sale or disposal of the assets and property
2356 of the district; the priority of assessment liens; the priority
2357 of claims by bondholders on the taxing power of the district;
2358 the maintenance of deposits to ensure the payment of revenues by
2359 users of district facilities and services; the discontinuance of
2360 district services by reason of delinquent payments; acceleration
2361 upon default; the execution of necessary instruments; the
2362 procedure for amending or abrogating covenants with the
2363 bondholders; and such other covenants as may be deemed necessary
2364 or desirable for the security of the bondholders.
2365 (l) Validation proceedings.—The power of the district to
2366 issue bonds under this act may be determined, and any of the
2367 bonds of the district maturing over a period of more than 5
2368 years shall be validated and confirmed, by court decree, under
2369 chapter 75, Florida Statutes, and laws amendatory thereof or
2370 supplementary thereto.
2371 (m) Tax exemption.—To the extent allowed by general law,
2372 all bonds issued hereunder and interest paid thereon and all
2373 fees, charges, and other revenues derived by the district from
2374 the projects provided by this act are exempt from all taxes by
2375 the state or by any political subdivision, agency, or
Page 95 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2376 instrumentality thereof; however, any interest, income, or
2377 profits on debt obligations issued hereunder are not exempt from
2378 the tax imposed by chapter 220, Florida Statutes. Further, the
2379 district is not exempt from chapter 212, Florida Statutes.
2380 (n) Application of s. 189.051, Florida Statutes.—Bonds
2381 issued by the district shall meet the criteria set forth in s.
2382 189.051, Florida Statutes.
2383 (o) Act furnishes full authority for issuance of bonds.—
2384 This act constitutes full and complete authority for the
2385 issuance of bonds and the exercise of the powers of the district
2386 provided herein. Procedures or proceedings, publications,
2387 notices, consents, approvals, orders, acts, or things by the
2388 board, or by any board, officer, commission, department, agency,
2389 or instrumentality of the district, other than those required by
2390 this act, are not required to perform anything under this act,
2391 except that the issuance or sale of bonds pursuant to this act
2392 shall comply with the general law requirements applicable to the
2393 issuance or sale of bonds by the district. This act does not
2394 authorize the district to utilize bond proceeds to fund the
2395 ongoing operations of the district.
2396 (p) Pledge by the state to the bondholders of the
2397 district.—The state pledges to the holders of any bonds issued
2398 under this act that it will not limit or alter the rights of the
2399 district to own, acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve,
2400 maintain, operate, or furnish the projects or to levy and
Page 96 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2401 collect the taxes, assessments, rentals, rates, fees, and other
2402 charges provided for herein and to fulfill the terms of any
2403 agreement made with the holders of such bonds or other
2404 obligations and that it will not in any way impair the rights or
2405 remedies of such holders.
2406 (q) Default.—A default on the bonds or obligations of the
2407 district does not constitute a debt or obligation of the state
2408 or any general-purpose local government of the state. In the
2409 event of a default or dissolution of the district, a general-
2410 purpose local government is not required to assume the property
2411 of the district, the debts of the district, or the district's
2412 obligations to complete any infrastructure improvements or
2413 provide any services to the district. Section 189.076(2),
2414 Florida Statutes, does not apply to the district.
2415 (11) TRUST AGREEMENTS.—Any issue of bonds shall be
2416 secured by a trust agreement or resolution by and between the
2417 district and a corporate trustee or trustees, which may be any
2418 trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company
2419 within or without the state. The resolution authorizing the
2420 issuance of the bonds or such trust agreement may pledge the
2421 revenues to be received from any projects of the district and
2422 may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the
2423 rights and remedies of the bondholders as the board may approve,
2424 including, without limitation, covenants setting forth the
2425 duties of the district in relation to the acquisition,
Page 97 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2426 construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, repair,
2427 operation, and insurance of any projects; the fixing and
2428 revising of the rates, fees, and charges; and the custody,
2429 safeguarding, and application of all moneys and for the
2430 employment of consulting engineers in connection with such
2431 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement,
2432 maintenance, repair, operation, or insurance. It shall be lawful
2433 for any bank or trust company within or without the state which
2434 may act as a depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues
2435 to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities
2436 as may be required by the district. Such resolution or trust
2437 agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the
2438 bondholders and of the trustee, if any, and may restrict the
2439 individual right of action by bondholders. The board may provide
2440 for the payment of proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the
2441 revenues of any project to such officer, board, or depository as
2442 it may designate for the custody thereof and may provide for the
2443 method of disbursement thereof with such safeguards and
2444 restrictions as it may determine. All expenses incurred in
2445 carrying out such resolution or trust agreement may be treated
2446 as part of the cost of operation of the project to which such
2447 trust agreement pertains.
2448 (12) AD VALOREM TAXES; ASSESSMENTS, BENEFIT SPECIAL
2449 ASSESSMENTS, MAINTENANCE SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS, AND SPECIAL
2450 ASSESSMENTS; MAINTENANCE TAXES.—
Page 98 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2451 (a) Ad valorem taxes.—At such time as all members of the
2452 board are qualified electors who are elected by qualified
2453 electors of the district, the board shall have the power to levy
2454 and assess an ad valorem tax on all the taxable property in the
2455 district to construct, operate, and maintain assessable
2456 improvements; to pay the principal of, and interest on, any
2457 general obligation bonds of the district; and to provide for any
2458 sinking or other funds established in connection with any such
2459 bonds. An ad valorem tax levied by the board for operating
2460 purposes, exclusive of debt service on bonds, may not exceed 3
2461 mills. The ad valorem tax provided for herein shall be in
2462 addition to county and all other ad valorem taxes provided for
2463 by general law. Such tax shall be assessed, levied, and
2464 collected in the same manner and at the same time as county
2465 taxes. The levy of ad valorem taxes must be approved by
2466 referendum as required by Section 9, Article VII of the State
2467 Constitution and held at a general election.
2468 (b) Benefit special assessments.—The board annually shall
2469 determine, order, and levy the annual installment of the total
2470 benefit special assessments for bonds issued and related
2471 expenses to finance assessable improvements. These assessments
2472 may be due and collected during each year county taxes are due
2473 and collected, in which case such annual installment and levy
2474 shall be evidenced to and certified to the property appraiser by
2475 the board not later than August 31 of each year. Such assessment
Page 99 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2476 shall be entered by the property appraiser on the county tax
2477 rolls and shall be collected and enforced by the tax collector
2478 in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes, and the
2479 proceeds thereof shall be paid to the district. However, this
2480 subsection does not prohibit the district in its discretion from
2481 using the method provided in s. 197.3632, Florida Statutes, or
2482 chapter 173, Florida Statutes, as each may be amended from time
2483 to time, for collecting and enforcing these assessments. Each
2484 annual installment of benefit special assessments shall be a
2485 lien on the property against which assessed until paid and shall
2486 be enforceable in like manner as county taxes. The amount of the
2487 assessment for the exercise of the district's powers under
2488 subsections (6) and (7) shall be determined by the board based
2489 upon a report of the district's engineer and assessed by the
2490 board upon such lands, which may be part or all of the lands
2491 within the district benefited by the improvement, apportioned
2492 between benefited lands in proportion to the benefits received
2493 by each tract of land. The board may, if it determines it is in
2494 the best interests of the district, set forth in the proceedings
2495 initially levying such benefit special assessments or in
2496 subsequent proceedings a formula for the determination of an
2497 amount which, when paid by a taxpayer with respect to any tax
2498 parcel, shall constitute a prepayment of all future annual
2499 installments of such benefit special assessments. The payment of
2500 such amount with respect to such tax parcel shall relieve and
Page 100 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2501 discharge such tax parcel of the lien of such benefit special
2502 assessments and any subsequent annual installment thereof. The
2503 board may provide further that upon delinquency in the payment
2504 of any annual installment of benefit special assessments, such
2505 prepayment amount of all future annual installments of benefit
2506 special assessments shall be and become immediately due and
2507 payable together with such delinquent annual installment.
2508 (c) Non-ad valorem maintenance taxes.—If and when
2509 authorized by general law, to maintain and to preserve the
2510 physical facilities and services constituting the works,
2511 improvements, or infrastructure owned by the district pursuant
2512 to this act, to repair and restore any one or more of them, when
2513 needed, and to defray the current expenses of the district,
2514 including any sum which may be required to pay state and county
2515 ad valorem taxes on any lands which may have been purchased and
2516 which are held by the district under this act, the board of
2517 supervisors may, upon the completion of said systems,
2518 facilities, services, works, improvements, or infrastructure, in
2519 whole or in part, as may be certified to the board by the
2520 engineer of the board, levy annually a non-ad valorem and
2521 nonmillage tax upon each tract or parcel of land within the
2522 district, to be known as a "maintenance tax." A maintenance tax
2523 shall be apportioned upon the basis of the net assessments of
2524 benefits assessed as accruing from the original construction and
2525 shall be evidenced to and certified by the board of supervisors
Page 101 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2526 of the district not later than June 1 of each year to the
2527 Hillsborough County tax collector and shall be extended on the
2528 tax rolls and collected by the tax collector on the merged
2529 collection roll of the tax collector in the same manner and at
2530 the same time as county ad valorem taxes, and the proceeds
2531 therefrom shall be paid to the district. The maintenance tax
2532 shall be a lien until paid on the property against which
2533 assessed and enforceable in like manner and of the same dignity
2534 as county ad valorem taxes.
2535 (d) Maintenance special assessments.—To maintain and
2536 preserve the facilities and projects of the district, the board
2537 may levy a maintenance special assessment. This assessment may
2538 be evidenced to and certified to the tax collector by the board
2539 of supervisors not later than August 31 of each year and shall
2540 be entered by the property appraiser on the county tax rolls and
2541 shall be collected and enforced by the tax collector in the same
2542 manner and at the same time as county taxes, and the proceeds
2543 therefrom shall be paid to the district. However, this
2544 subsection does not prohibit the district in its discretion from
2545 using the method prescribed in s. 197.363, s. 197.3631, or s.
2546 197.3632, Florida Statutes, for collecting and enforcing these
2547 assessments. These maintenance special assessments shall be a
2548 lien on the property against which assessed until paid and shall
2549 be enforceable in like manner as county taxes. The amount of the
2550 maintenance special assessment for the exercise of the
Page 102 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2551 district's powers under this section shall be determined by the
2552 board based upon a report of the district's engineer and
2553 assessed by the board upon such lands, which may be all of the
2554 lands within the district benefited by the maintenance thereof,
2555 apportioned between the benefited lands in proportion to the
2556 benefits received by each tract of land.
2557 (e) Special assessments.—The board may levy and impose
2558 any special assessments pursuant to this subsection.
2559 (f) Enforcement of taxes.—The collection and enforcement
2560 of all taxes levied by the district shall be at the same time
2561 and in like manner as county taxes and the provisions of general
2562 law relating to the sale of lands for unpaid and delinquent
2563 county taxes; the issuance, sale, and delivery of tax
2564 certificates for such unpaid and delinquent county taxes; the
2565 redemption thereof; the issuance to individuals of tax deeds
2566 based thereon; and all other procedures in connection therewith
2567 shall be applicable to the district to the same extent as if
2568 such statutory provisions were expressly set forth in this act.
2569 All taxes shall be subject to the same discounts as county
2570 taxes.
2571 (g) When unpaid tax is delinquent; penalty.—All taxes
2572 provided for in this act shall become delinquent and bear
2573 penalties on the amount of such taxes in the same manner as
2574 county taxes.
2575 (h) Status of assessments.—Benefit special assessments,
Page 103 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2576 maintenance special assessments, and special assessments are
2577 hereby found and determined to be non-ad valorem assessments as
2578 defined in s. 197.3632(1), Florida Statutes. Maintenance taxes
2579 are non-ad valorem taxes and are not special assessments.
2580 (i) Assessments constitute liens; collection.—Any and all
2581 assessments, including special assessments, benefit special
2582 assessments, and maintenance special assessments authorized and
2583 granted by this subsection and maintenance taxes if authorized
2584 by general law, shall constitute a lien on the property against
2585 which assessed from the date of levy and imposition thereof
2586 until paid, coequal with the lien of state, county, municipal,
2587 and school board taxes. These assessments may be collected, at
2588 the district's discretion, under authority of s. 197.3631,
2589 Florida Statutes, as amended from time to time, by the tax
2590 collector pursuant to ss. 197.3632 and 197.3635, Florida
2591 Statutes, as amended from time to time, or in accordance with
2592 other collection measures provided by general law. In addition
2593 to, and not in limitation of, any powers otherwise set forth
2594 herein or in general law, these assessments may also be enforced
2595 pursuant to chapter 173, Florida Statutes, as amended from time
2596 to time.
2597 (j) Land owned by governmental entity.—Except as
2598 otherwise provided by general law, a levy of ad valorem taxes or
2599 non-ad valorem assessments under this act or chapter 170 or
2600 chapter 197, Florida Statutes, or otherwise by the board of the
Page 104 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2601 district on property of a governmental entity that is subject to
2602 a ground lease as described in s. 190.003(14), Florida Statutes,
2603 does not constitute a lien or encumbrance on the underlying fee
2604 interest of such governmental entity.
2605 (13) SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS.—
2606 (a) As an alternative method to the levy and imposition
2607 of special assessments pursuant to chapter 170, Florida
2608 Statutes, pursuant to the authority under s. 197.3631, Florida
2609 Statutes, or pursuant to other provisions of general law, now or
2610 hereafter enacted, which provide a supplemental means or
2611 authority to impose, levy, and collect special assessments as
2612 otherwise authorized under this act, the board may levy and
2613 impose special assessments to finance the exercise of any of its
2614 powers permitted under this act using the following uniform
2615 procedures:
2616 1. At a noticed meeting, the board of supervisors of the
2617 district may consider and review an engineer's report on the
2618 costs of the systems, facilities, and services to be provided; a
2619 preliminary special assessment methodology; and a preliminary
2620 roll based on acreage or platted lands, depending upon whether
2621 platting has occurred.
2622 a. The special assessment methodology shall address and
2623 discuss and the board shall consider whether the systems,
2624 facilities, and services being contemplated will result in
2625 special benefits peculiar to the property, different in kind and
Page 105 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2626 degree than general benefits, as a logical connection between
2627 the systems, facilities, and services themselves and the
2628 property, and whether the duty to pay the special assessments by
2629 the property owners is apportioned in a manner that is fair and
2630 equitable and not in excess of the special benefit received. It
2631 shall be fair and equitable to designate a fixed proportion of
2632 the annual debt service, together with interest thereon, on the
2633 aggregate principal amount of bonds issued to finance such
2634 systems, facilities, and services which give rise to unique,
2635 special, and peculiar benefits to property of the same or
2636 similar characteristics under the special assessment methodology
2637 so long as such fixed proportion does not exceed the unique,
2638 special, and peculiar benefits enjoyed by such property from
2639 such systems, facilities, and services.
2640 b. The engineer's cost report shall identify the nature
2641 of the proposed systems, facilities, and services, their
2642 location, a cost breakdown plus a total estimated cost,
2643 including cost of construction or reconstruction, labor, and
2644 materials, lands, property, rights, easements, franchises, or
2645 systems, facilities, and services to be acquired; cost of plans
2646 and specifications and surveys of estimates of costs and
2647 revenues; costs of engineering, legal, and other professional
2648 consultation services; and other expenses or costs necessary or
2649 incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of
2650 such construction, reconstruction, or acquisition,
Page 106 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2651 administrative expenses, relationship to the authority and power
2652 of the district in its charter, and such other expenses or costs
2653 as may be necessary or incident to the financing to be
2654 authorized by the board of supervisors.
2655 c. The preliminary special assessment roll shall be in
2656 accordance with the assessment methodology as may be adopted by
2657 the board of supervisors; the special assessment roll shall be
2658 completed as promptly as possible and shall show the acreage,
2659 lots, lands, or plats assessed and the amount of the fairly and
2660 reasonably apportioned assessment based on special and peculiar
2661 benefit to the property, lot, parcel, or acreage of land; and,
2662 if the special assessment against such lot, parcel, acreage, or
2663 portion of land is to be paid in installments, the number of
2664 annual installments in which the special assessment is divided
2665 shall be entered into and shown upon the special assessment
2666 roll.
2667 2. The board of supervisors of the district may determine
2668 and declare by an initial special assessment resolution to levy
2669 and assess the special assessments with respect to assessable
2670 improvements stating the nature of the systems, facilities, and
2671 services, improvements, projects, or infrastructure constituting
2672 such assessable improvements, the information in the engineer's
2673 cost report, the information in the special assessment
2674 methodology as determined by the board at the noticed meeting
2675 and referencing and incorporating as part of the resolution the
Page 107 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2676 engineer's cost report, the preliminary special assessment
2677 methodology, and the preliminary special assessment roll as
2678 referenced exhibits to the resolution by reference. If the board
2679 determines to declare and levy the special assessments by the
2680 initial special assessment resolution, the board shall also
2681 adopt and declare a notice resolution which shall provide and
2682 cause the initial special assessment resolution to be published
2683 in a newspaper of general circulation in Hillsborough County
2684 once a week for 2 consecutive weeks, and said board shall by the
2685 same resolution fix a time and place at which the owner or
2686 owners of the property to be assessed or any other persons
2687 interested therein may appear before said board and be heard as
2688 to the propriety and advisability of making such improvements,
2689 as to the costs thereof, as to the manner of payment therefor,
2690 and as to the amount thereof to be assessed against each
2691 property so improved. Thirty days' notice in writing of such
2692 time and place shall be given to such property owners. The
2693 notice shall include the amount of the special assessment and
2694 shall be served by mailing a copy to each assessed property
2695 owner at his or her last known address, the names and addresses
2696 of such property owners to be obtained from the record of the
2697 property appraiser of the county political subdivision in which
2698 the land is located or from such other sources as the district
2699 manager or engineer deems reliable. Proof of such mailing shall
2700 be made by the affidavit of the manager of the district or by
Page 108 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2701 the engineer, said proof to be filed with the district manager.
2702 Failure to mail said notice or notices does not invalidate any
2703 of the proceedings hereunder. It is provided further that the
2704 last publication shall be at least 1 week before the date of the
2705 hearing on the final special assessment resolution. Said notice
2706 shall describe the general areas to be improved and advise all
2707 persons interested that the description of each property to be
2708 assessed and the amount to be assessed to each piece, parcel,
2709 lot, or acre of property may be ascertained at the office of the
2710 manager of the district. Such service by publication shall be
2711 verified by the affidavit of the publisher and filed with the
2712 manager of the district. Moreover, the initial special
2713 assessment resolution with its attached, referenced, and
2714 incorporated engineer's cost report, preliminary special
2715 assessment methodology, and preliminary special assessment roll,
2716 along with the notice resolution, shall be available for public
2717 inspection at the office of the manager and the office of the
2718 engineer or any other office designated by the board of
2719 supervisors in the notice resolution. Notwithstanding the
2720 foregoing, the landowners of all of the property which is
2721 proposed to be assessed may give the district written notice of
2722 waiver of any notice and publication provided for in this
2723 subparagraph. However, such notice and publication is not
2724 required, provided that any meeting of the board of supervisors
2725 to consider such resolution is a publicly noticed meeting.
Page 109 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2726 3. At the time and place named in the noticed resolution
2727 as provided for in subparagraph 2., the board of supervisors of
2728 the district shall meet and hear testimony from affected
2729 property owners as to the propriety and advisability of making
2730 the systems, facilities, services, projects, works,
2731 improvements, or infrastructure and funding them with
2732 assessments referenced in the initial special assessment
2733 resolution on the property. Following the testimony and
2734 questions from the members of the board or any professional
2735 advisors to the district of the preparers of the engineer's cost
2736 report, the special assessment methodology, and the special
2737 assessment roll, the board of supervisors shall make a final
2738 decision on whether to levy and assess the particular special
2739 assessments. Thereafter, the board of supervisors shall meet as
2740 an equalizing board to hear and to consider any and all
2741 complaints as to the particular special assessments and shall
2742 adjust and equalize the special assessments to ensure proper
2743 assessment based on the benefit conferred on the property.
2744 4. When so equalized and approved by resolution or
2745 ordinance by the board of supervisors, to be called the final
2746 special assessment resolution, a final special assessment roll
2747 shall be filed with the clerk of the board, and such special
2748 assessment shall stand confirmed and remain legal, valid, and
2749 binding first liens on the property against which such special
2750 assessments are made until paid, equal in dignity to the first
Page 110 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2751 liens of ad valorem taxation of county and municipal governments
2752 and school boards. However, upon completion of the systems,
2753 facilities, services, projects, improvements, works, or
2754 infrastructure, the district shall credit to each of the
2755 assessments the difference in the special assessment as
2756 originally made, approved, levied, assessed, and confirmed and
2757 the proportionate part of the actual cost of the improvement to
2758 be paid by the particular special assessments as finally
2759 determined upon the completion of the improvement; but in no
2760 event shall the final special assessment exceed the amount of
2761 the special and peculiar benefits as apportioned fairly and
2762 reasonably to the property from the system, facility, or service
2763 being provided as originally assessed. Promptly after such
2764 confirmation, the special assessment shall be recorded by the
2765 clerk of the district in the minutes of the proceedings of the
2766 district, and the record of the lien in this set of minutes
2767 shall constitute prima facie evidence of its validity. The board
2768 of supervisors, in its sole discretion, may, by resolution,
2769 grant a discount equal to all or a part of the payee's
2770 proportionate share of the cost of the project consisting of
2771 bond financing cost, such as capitalized interest, funded
2772 reserves, and bond discounts included in the estimated cost of
2773 the project, upon payment in full of any special assessments
2774 during such period before the time such financing costs are
2775 incurred as may be specified by the board of supervisors in such
Page 111 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2776 resolution.
2777 5. District special assessments may be made payable in
2778 installments over no more than 40 years after the date of the
2779 payment of the first installment thereof and may bear interest
2780 at fixed or variable rates.
2781 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of this act or chapter
2782 170, Florida Statutes, that portion of s. 170.09, Florida
2783 Statutes, which provides that special assessments may be paid
2784 without interest at any time within 30 days after the
2785 improvement is completed and a resolution accepting the same has
2786 been adopted by the governing authority is not applicable to any
2787 district special assessments, whether imposed, levied, and
2788 collected pursuant to this act or any other provision of general
2789 law, including, but not limited to, chapter 170, Florida
2790 Statutes.
2791 (c) In addition, the district is authorized expressly in
2792 the exercise of its rulemaking power to adopt rules that provide
2793 for notice, levy, imposition, equalization, and collection of
2794 assessments.
2795 (14) ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATES OF INDEBTEDNESS BASED ON
2796 ASSESSMENTS FOR ASSESSABLE IMPROVEMENTS; ASSESSMENT BONDS.—
2797 (a) The board may, after any special assessments or
2798 benefit special assessments for assessable improvements are
2799 made, determined, and confirmed as provided in this act, issue
2800 certificates of indebtedness for the amount so assessed against
Page 112 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2801 the abutting property or property otherwise benefited, as the
2802 case may be, and separate certificates shall be issued against
2803 each part or parcel of land or property assessed, which
2804 certificates shall state the general nature of the improvement
2805 for which the assessment is made. The certificates shall be
2806 payable in annual installments in accordance with the
2807 installments of the special assessment for which they are
2808 issued. The board may determine the interest to be borne by such
2809 certificates, not to exceed the maximum rate allowed by general
2810 law, and may sell such certificates at either private or public
2811 sale and determine the form, manner of execution, and other
2812 details of such certificates. The certificates shall recite that
2813 they are payable only from the special assessments levied and
2814 collected from the part or parcel of land or property against
2815 which they are issued. The proceeds of such certificates may be
2816 pledged for the payment of principal of and interest on any
2817 revenue bonds or general obligation bonds issued to finance in
2818 whole or in part such assessable improvement or, if not so
2819 pledged, may be used to pay the cost or part of the cost of such
2820 assessable improvements.
2821 (b) The district may also issue assessment bonds, revenue
2822 bonds, or other obligations payable from a special fund into
2823 which such certificates of indebtedness referred to in paragraph
2824 (a) may be deposited or, if such certificates of indebtedness
2825 have not been issued, may assign to such special fund for the
Page 113 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2826 benefit of the holders of such assessment bonds or other
2827 obligations, or to a trustee for such bondholders, the
2828 assessment liens provided for in this act unless such
2829 certificates of indebtedness or assessment liens have been
2830 theretofore pledged for any bonds or other obligations
2831 authorized hereunder. In the event of the creation of such
2832 special fund and the issuance of such assessment bonds or other
2833 obligations, the proceeds of such certificates of indebtedness
2834 or assessment liens deposited therein shall be used only for the
2835 payment of the assessment bonds or other obligations issued as
2836 provided in this section. The district is authorized to covenant
2837 with the holders of such assessment bonds, revenue bonds, or
2838 other obligations that it will diligently and faithfully enforce
2839 and collect all the special assessments, and interest and
2840 penalties thereon, for which such certificates of indebtedness
2841 or assessment liens have been deposited in or assigned to such
2842 fund; to foreclose such assessment liens so assigned to such
2843 special fund or represented by the certificates of indebtedness
2844 deposited in the special fund, after such assessment liens have
2845 become delinquent, and deposit the proceeds derived from such
2846 foreclosure, including interest and penalties, in such special
2847 fund; and to make any other covenants deemed necessary or
2848 advisable in order to properly secure the holders of such
2849 assessment bonds or other obligations.
2850 (c) The assessment bonds, revenue bonds, or other
Page 114 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2851 obligations issued pursuant to this subsection shall have such
2852 dates of issuance and maturity as deemed advisable by the board;
2853 however, the maturities of such assessment bonds or other
2854 obligations may not be more than 2 years after the due date of
2855 the last installment that will be payable on any of the special
2856 assessments for which such assessment liens, or the certificates
2857 of indebtedness representing such assessment liens, are assigned
2858 to or deposited in such special fund.
2859 (d) Such assessment bonds, revenue bonds, or other
2860 obligations issued under this subsection shall bear such
2861 interest as the board may determine, not to exceed the maximum
2862 rate allowed by general law, and shall be executed, shall have
2863 such provisions for redemption before maturity, shall be sold in
2864 such manner, and shall be subject to all of the applicable
2865 provisions contained in this act for revenue bonds, except as
2866 the same may be inconsistent with this subsection.
2867 (e) All assessment bonds, revenue bonds, or other
2868 obligations issued under this subsection shall be, shall
2869 constitute, and shall have all the qualities and incidents of
2870 negotiable instruments under the law merchant and general laws.
2871 (15) TAX LIENS.—All taxes of the district provided for in
2872 this act, together with all penalties for default in the payment
2873 of the same and all costs in collecting the same, including a
2874 reasonable attorney fee fixed by the court and taxed as a cost
2875 in the action brought to enforce payment, shall, from January 1
Page 115 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2876 of each year the property is liable to assessment and until
2877 paid, constitute a lien of equal dignity with the liens for
2878 state and county taxes and other taxes of equal dignity with
2879 state and county taxes upon all the lands against which such
2880 taxes shall be levied. A sale of any of the real property within
2881 the district for state and county or other taxes may not operate
2882 to relieve or release the property so sold from the lien for
2883 subsequent district taxes or installments of district taxes,
2884 which lien may be enforced against such property as though no
2885 such sale thereof had been made. In addition, for purposes of s.
2886 197.552, Florida Statutes, the lien of all special assessments
2887 levied by the district shall constitute a lien of record held by
2888 a municipal or county governmental unit. Sections 194.171,
2889 197.122, 197.333, and 197.432, Florida Statutes, are applicable
2890 to district taxes with the same force and effect as if such
2891 sections were expressly provided in this act.
2892 (16) PAYMENT OF TAXES AND REDEMPTION OF TAX LIENS BY THE
2893 DISTRICT; SHARING IN PROCEEDS OF TAX SALE.—
2894 (a) The district shall have the power and right to:
2895 1. Pay any delinquent state, county, district, municipal,
2896 or other tax or assessment upon lands located wholly or
2897 partially within the boundaries of the district.
2898 2. Redeem or purchase any tax sales certificates issued
2899 or sold on account of any state, county, district, municipal, or
2900 other taxes or assessments upon lands located wholly or
Page 116 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2901 partially within the boundaries of the district.
2902 (b) Delinquent taxes paid, or tax sales certificates
2903 redeemed or purchased, by the district, together with all
2904 penalties for the default in payment of the same and all costs
2905 in collecting the same and a reasonable attorney fee, shall
2906 constitute a lien in favor of the district of equal dignity with
2907 the liens of state and county taxes and other taxes of equal
2908 dignity with state and county taxes upon all the real property
2909 against which the taxes were levied. The lien of the district
2910 may be foreclosed in the manner provided in this act.
2911 (c) In any sale of land pursuant to s. 197.542, Florida
2912 Statutes, as may be amended from time to time, the district may
2913 certify to the clerk of the circuit court of the county holding
2914 such sale the amount of taxes due to the district upon the lands
2915 sought to be sold, and the district shall share in the
2916 disbursement of the sales proceeds in accordance with this act
2917 and under general law.
2918 (17) FORECLOSURE OF LIENS.—Any lien in favor of the
2919 district arising under this act may be foreclosed by the
2920 district by foreclosure proceedings in the name of the district
2921 in a court of competent jurisdiction as provided by general law
2922 in like manner as is provided in chapter 170 or chapter 173,
2923 Florida Statutes, and any amendments thereto, and those chapters
2924 shall be applicable to such proceedings with the same force and
2925 effect as if those chapters were expressly provided in this act.
Page 117 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2926 Any act required or authorized to be done by or on behalf of a
2927 municipality in foreclosure proceedings under chapter 170 or
2928 chapter 173, Florida Statutes, may be performed by such officer
2929 or agent of the district as the board of supervisors may
2930 designate. Such foreclosure proceedings may be brought at any
2931 time after the expiration of 1 year from the date any tax, or
2932 installment thereof, becomes delinquent; however, no lien shall
2933 be foreclosed against any political subdivision or agency of the
2934 state. Other legal remedies shall remain available.
2935 (18) MANDATORY USE OF CERTAIN DISTRICT SYSTEMS,
2936 FACILITIES, AND SERVICES.—To the full extent permitted by
2937 general law, the district shall require all lands, buildings,
2938 premises, persons, firms, and corporations within the district
2939 to use the facilities of the district.
2940 (19) COMPETITIVE PROCUREMENT; BIDS; NEGOTIATIONS; RELATED
2941 PROVISIONS REQUIRED.—
2942 (a) A contract may not be let by the board for any goods,
2943 supplies, or materials to be purchased when the amount thereof
2944 to be paid by the district shall exceed the amount provided in
2945 s. 287.017, Florida Statutes, for category four, unless notice
2946 of bids shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation
2947 in Hillsborough County at least once. Any board seeking to
2948 construct or improve a public building, structure, or other
2949 public works shall comply with the bidding procedures of s.
2950 255.20, Florida Statutes, as amended from time to time, and
Page 118 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2951 other applicable general law. In each case, the bid of the
2952 lowest responsive and responsible bidder shall be accepted
2953 unless all bids are rejected because the bids are too high or
2954 the board determines it is in the best interests of the district
2955 to reject all bids. The board may require the bidders to furnish
2956 bond with a responsible surety to be approved by the board.
2957 Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the board from
2958 undertaking and performing the construction, operation, and
2959 maintenance of any project or facility authorized by this act by
2960 the employment of labor, material, and machinery.
2961 (b) The Consultants' Competitive Negotiation Act, s.
2962 287.055, Florida Statutes, applies to contracts for engineering,
2963 architecture, landscape architecture, or registered surveying
2964 and mapping services let by the board.
2965 (c) Contracts for maintenance services for any district
2966 facility or project shall be subject to competitive bidding
2967 requirements when the amount thereof to be paid by the district
2968 exceeds the amount provided in s. 287.017, Florida Statutes, as
2969 amended from time to time, for category four. The district shall
2970 adopt rules, policies, or procedures establishing competitive
2971 bidding procedures for maintenance services. Contracts for other
2972 services may not be subject to competitive bidding unless the
2973 district adopts a rule, policy, or procedure applying
2974 competitive bidding procedures to said contracts. Nothing herein
2975 shall preclude the use of requests for proposal instead of
Page 119 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
2976 invitations to bid as determined by the district to be in its
2977 best interest.
2978 (20) FEES, RENTALS, AND CHARGES; PROCEDURE FOR ADOPTION
2979 AND MODIFICATIONS; MINIMUM REVENUE REQUIREMENTS.—
2980 (a) The district is authorized to prescribe, fix,
2981 establish, and collect rates, fees, rentals, or other charges,
2982 hereinafter sometimes referred to as "revenues," and to revise
2983 the same from time to time, for the systems, facilities, and
2984 services furnished by the district, including, but not limited
2985 to, recreational facilities, water management and control
2986 facilities, and water and sewer systems; to recover the costs of
2987 making connection with any district service, facility, or
2988 system; and to provide for reasonable penalties against any user
2989 or property for any such rates, fees, rentals, or other charges
2990 that are delinquent.
2991 (b) No such rates, fees, rentals, or other charges for
2992 any of the facilities or services of the district shall be fixed
2993 until after a public hearing at which all the users of the
2994 proposed facility or services or owners, tenants, or occupants
2995 served or to be served thereby and all other interested persons
2996 shall have an opportunity to be heard concerning the proposed
2997 rates, fees, rentals, or other charges. Rates, fees, rentals,
2998 and other charges shall be adopted under the administrative
2999 rulemaking authority of the district but do not apply to
3000 district leases. Notice of such public hearing setting forth the
Page 120 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3001 proposed schedule or schedules of rates, fees, rentals, and
3002 other charges shall have been published in a newspaper of
3003 general circulation in Hillsborough County at least once and at
3004 least 10 days before such public hearing. The rulemaking hearing
3005 may be adjourned from time to time. After such hearing, such
3006 schedule or schedules, either as initially proposed or as
3007 modified or amended, may be finally adopted. A copy of the
3008 schedule or schedules of such rates, fees, rentals, or charges
3009 as finally adopted shall be kept on file in an office designated
3010 by the board and shall be open at all reasonable times to public
3011 inspection. The rates, fees, rentals, or charges so fixed for
3012 any class of users or property served shall be extended to cover
3013 any additional users or properties thereafter served which shall
3014 fall in the same class, without the necessity of any notice or
3015 hearing.
3016 (c) Such rates, fees, rentals, and charges shall be just
3017 and equitable and uniform for users of the same class and, when
3018 appropriate, may be based or computed either upon the amount of
3019 service furnished, upon the average number of persons residing
3020 or working in or otherwise occupying the premises served, or
3021 upon any other factor affecting the use of the facilities
3022 furnished, or upon any combination of the foregoing factors, as
3023 may be determined by the board on an equitable basis.
3024 (d) The rates, fees, rentals, or other charges prescribed
3025 shall be such as will produce revenues, together with any other
Page 121 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3026 assessments, taxes, revenues, or funds available or pledged for
3027 such purpose, at least sufficient to provide for the following
3028 items, but not necessarily in the order stated:
3029 1. To provide for all expenses of operation and
3030 maintenance of such facility or service.
3031 2. To pay when due all bonds and interest thereon for the
3032 payment of which such revenues are, or shall have been, pledged
3033 or encumbered, including reserves for such purpose.
3034 3. To provide for any other funds which may be required
3035 under the resolution or resolutions authorizing the issuance of
3036 bonds pursuant to this act.
3037 (e) The board shall have the power to enter into
3038 contracts for the use of the projects of the district and with
3039 respect to the services, systems, and facilities furnished or to
3040 be furnished by the district.
3041 (21) RECOVERY OF DELINQUENT CHARGES.—In the event that
3042 any rates, fees, rentals, charges, or delinquent penalties are
3043 not paid as and when due and are in default for 60 days or more,
3044 the unpaid balance thereof and all interest accrued thereon,
3045 together with reasonable attorney fees and costs, may be
3046 recovered by the district in a civil action.
3047 (22) DISCONTINUANCE OF SERVICES OR FACILITIES.—In the
3048 event the fees, rentals, or other charges for district services
3049 or facilities are not paid when due, the board shall have the
3050 power, under such reasonable rules and regulations as the board
Page 122 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3051 may adopt, to discontinue and shut off such services or
3052 facilities until such fees, rentals, or other charges, including
3053 interest, penalties, and charges for the shutting off and
3054 discontinuance and the restoration of such services or
3055 facilities, are fully paid; and, for such purposes, the board
3056 may enter on any lands, waters, or premises of any person, firm,
3057 corporation, or body, public or private, within the district
3058 limits. Such delinquent fees, rentals, or other charges,
3059 together with interest, penalties, and charges for the shutting
3060 off and discontinuance and the restoration of such services or
3061 facilities and reasonable attorney fees and other expenses, may
3062 be recovered by the district, which may also enforce payment of
3063 such delinquent fees, rentals, or other charges by any other
3064 lawful method of enforcement.
3065 (23) ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIES.—The board or any
3066 aggrieved person may have recourse to such remedies in general
3067 law and at equity as may be necessary to ensure compliance with
3068 this act, including injunctive relief to enjoin or restrain any
3069 person violating this act or any bylaws, resolutions,
3070 regulations, rules, codes, or orders adopted under this act. In
3071 case any building or structure is erected, constructed,
3072 reconstructed, altered, repaired, converted, or maintained, or
3073 any building, structure, land, or water is used, in violation of
3074 this act or of any code, order, resolution, or other regulation
3075 made under authority conferred by this act or under general law,
Page 123 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3076 the board or any citizen residing in the district may institute
3077 any appropriate action or proceeding to prevent such unlawful
3078 erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair,
3079 conversion, maintenance, or use; to restrain, correct, or avoid
3080 such violation; to prevent the occupancy of such building,
3081 structure, land, or water; and to prevent any illegal act,
3082 conduct, business, or use in or about such premises, land, or
3083 water.
3084 (24) SUITS AGAINST THE DISTRICT.—Any suit or action
3085 brought or maintained against the district for damages arising
3086 out of tort, including, without limitation, any claim arising
3087 upon account of an act causing an injury or loss of property,
3088 personal injury, or death, shall be subject to the limitations
3089 provided in s. 768.28, Florida Statutes.
3090 (25) EXEMPTION OF DISTRICT PROPERTY FROM EXECUTION.—All
3091 district property shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue
3092 of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process
3093 shall issue against such property, nor shall any judgment
3094 against the district be a charge or lien on its property or
3095 revenues; however, nothing contained herein shall apply to or
3096 limit the rights of bondholders to pursue any remedy for the
3097 enforcement of any lien or pledge given by the district in
3098 connection with any of the bonds or obligations of the district.
3099 (26) TERMINATION, CONTRACTION, OR EXPANSION OF DISTRICT.—
3100 (a) The board of supervisors of the district may not ask
Page 124 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3101 the Legislature to repeal or amend this act to expand or to
3102 contract the boundaries of the district or otherwise cause the
3103 merger or termination of the district without first obtaining a
3104 resolution or official statement from Hillsborough County as
3105 required by s. 189.031(2)(e)4., Florida Statutes, for creation
3106 of an independent special district. The district's consent may
3107 be evidenced by a resolution or other official written statement
3108 of the district.
3109 (b) The district shall remain in existence until:
3110 1. The district is terminated and dissolved pursuant to
3111 amendment to this act by the Legislature.
3112 2. The district has become inactive pursuant to s.
3113 189.062, Florida Statutes.
3114 (27) MERGER WITH COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS.—The
3115 district may merge with one or more community development
3116 districts situated wholly within its boundaries. The district
3117 shall be the surviving entity of the merger. Any mergers shall
3118 commence upon each such community development district filing a
3119 written request for merger with the district. A copy of the
3120 written request shall also be filed with Hillsborough County.
3121 The district, subject to the direction of its board of
3122 supervisors, shall enter into a merger agreement which shall
3123 provide for the proper allocation of debt, the manner in which
3124 such debt shall be retired, the transition of the community
3125 development district board, and the transfer of all financial
Page 125 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3126 obligations and operating and maintenance responsibilities to
3127 the district. The execution of the merger agreement by the
3128 district and each community development district constitutes
3129 consent of the landowners within each district. The district and
3130 each community development district requesting merger shall hold
3131 a public hearing within its boundaries to provide information
3132 about and take public comment on the proposed merger in the
3133 merger agreement. The public hearing shall be held within 45
3134 days after the execution of the merger agreement by all parties
3135 thereto. Notice of the public hearing shall be published in a
3136 newspaper of general circulation in Hillsborough County at least
3137 14 days before the hearing. At the conclusion of the public
3138 hearing, each district shall consider a resolution approving or
3139 disapproving the proposed merger. If the district and each
3140 community development district which is a party to the merger
3141 agreement adopt a resolution approving the proposed merger, the
3142 resolutions and the merger agreement shall be filed with
3143 Hillsborough County. Upon receipt of the resolutions approving
3144 the merger and the merger agreement, Hillsborough County shall
3145 adopt a nonemergency ordinance dissolving each community
3146 development district pursuant to s. 190.046(10), Florida
3147 Statutes.
3148 (28) INCLUSION OF TERRITORY.—The inclusion of any or all
3149 territory of the district within a municipality does not change,
3150 alter, or affect the boundary, territory, existence, or
Page 126 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3151 jurisdiction of the district.
3152 (29) SALE OF REAL ESTATE WITHIN THE DISTRICT; REQUIRED
3153 DISCLOSURE TO PURCHASER.—Subsequent to the creation of this
3154 district under this act, each contract for the initial sale of a
3155 parcel of real property and each contract for the initial sale
3156 of a residential unit within the district shall include,
3157 immediately before the space reserved in the contract for the
3158 signature of the purchaser, the following disclosure statement
3159 in boldfaced and conspicuous type which is larger than the type
3160 in the remaining text of the contract: "THE LAND RESERVE
3161 STEWARDSHIP DISTRICT MAY IMPOSE AND LEVY TAXES OR ASSESSMENTS,
3162 OR BOTH TAXES AND ASSESSMENTS, ON THIS PROPERTY. THESE TAXES AND
3163 ASSESSMENTS PAY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION, AND MAINTENANCE
3164 COSTS OF CERTAIN PUBLIC SYSTEMS, FACILITIES, AND SERVICES OF THE
3165 DISTRICT AND ARE SET ANNUALLY BY THE GOVERNING BOARD OF THE
3166 DISTRICT. THESE TAXES AND ASSESSMENTS ARE IN ADDITION TO COUNTY
3167 AND OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL TAXES AND ASSESSMENTS AND ALL OTHER
3168 TAXES AND ASSESSMENTS PROVIDED FOR BY GENERAL LAW."
3169 (30) NOTICE OF CREATION AND ESTABLISHMENT.—Within 30 days
3170 after the election of the first board of supervisors creating
3171 the district, the district shall cause to be recorded in the
3172 grantor-grantee index of the property records in Hillsborough
3173 County a "Notice of Creation and Establishment of the Land
3174 Reserve Stewardship District." The notice shall, at a minimum,
3175 include the legal description of the territory described in this
Page 127 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4061 2026 Legislature
3176 act.
3177 (31) DISTRICT PROPERTY PUBLIC; FEES.—Any system, facility,
3178 service, works, improvement, project, or other infrastructure
3179 owned by the district, or funded by federal tax-exempt bonding
3180 issued by the district, is public; and the district by rule may
3181 regulate, and may impose reasonable charges or fees for, the use
3182 thereof, but not to the extent that such regulation or
3183 imposition of such charges or fees constitutes denial of
3184 reasonable access.
3185 Section 7. If any provision of this act or its application
3186 to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity
3187 does not affect the remaining provisions or applications of the
3188 act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
3189 application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
3190 severable.
3191 Section 8. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law,
3192 except that the provisions of this act which authorize the levy
3193 of ad valorem taxation shall take effect only upon express
3194 approval by a majority vote of those qualified electors of the
3195 Land Reserve Stewardship District, as required by Section 9,
3196 Article VII of the State Constitution, voting in a referendum
3197 election held during a general election at such time as all
3198 members of the board are qualified electors who are elected by
3199 qualified electors of the district as provided in this act.
Page 128 of 128
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4061 -01-er